Utah, session 2026, HB32.
Section 1. Section 20A-1-102 is amended to read:20A-1-102Effective 05/06/26. Definitions.As used in this title:(1)"Active voter" means a registered voter who has not been classified as an inactive voter by the county clerk.(2)"Automatic tabulating equipment" means apparatus that automatically examines and counts votes recorded on ballots and tabulates the results.(3)(a)"Ballot" means the storage medium, including a paper, mechanical, or electronic storage medium, that records an individual voter's vote.(b)"Ballot" does not include a record to tally multiple votes.(4)"Ballot proposition" means a question, issue, or proposal that is submitted to voters on the ballot for their approval or rejection including:(a)an opinion question specifically authorized by the Legislature;(b)a constitutional amendment;(c)an initiative;(d)a referendum;(e)a bond proposition;(f)a judicial retention question;(g)an incorporation of a city or town; or(h)any other ballot question specifically authorized by the Legislature.(5)"Bind," "binding," or "bound" means securing more than one piece of paper together using staples, a spiral binder, or another means in at least three places across the top of the paper in the blank space reserved for securing the paper.(6)"Board of canvassers" means the entities established by Sections 20A-4-301 and 20A-4-306 to canvass election returns.(7)"Bond election" means an election held for the purpose of approving or rejecting the proposed issuance of bonds by a government entity.(8)"Business day" means a Monday, Tuesday, Wednesday, Thursday, or Friday that is not a holiday.(9)"Business reply mail envelope" means an envelope that may be mailed free of charge by the sender.(10)"Calendar day" means any day, regardless of whether the day is a weekend, a holiday, a business day, or any other type of day.(11)"Canvass" means the review of election returns and the official declaration of election results by the board of canvassers.(12)"Canvassing judge" means a poll worker designated to assist in counting ballots at the canvass.(13)"Contracting election officer" means an election officer who enters into a contract or interlocal agreement with a provider election officer.(14)"Convention" means the political party convention at which party officers and delegates are selected.(15)"Counting center" means one or more locations selected by the election officer in charge of the election for the automatic counting of ballots.(16)"Counting judge" means a poll worker designated to count the ballots during election day.(17)"Counting room" means a suitable and convenient private place or room for use by the poll workers and counting judges to count ballots.(18)"County officers" means those county officers that are required by law to be elected.(19)"Date of the election" or "election day" or "day of the election":(a)means the day that is specified in the calendar year as the day on which the election occurs; and(b)does not include:(i)deadlines established for voting by mail, military-overseas voting, or emergency voting; or(ii)any early voting or early voting period as provided under Chapter 3a, Part 6, Early Voting.(20)"Elected official" means:(a)a person elected to an office under Section 20A-1-303 or Chapter 4, Part 6, Municipal Alternate Voting Methods Pilot Project;(b)a person who is considered to be elected to a municipal office in accordance with Subsection 20A-1-206(1)(c)(ii); or(c)a person who is considered to be elected to a special district office in accordance with Subsection 20A-1-206(3)(b)(ii).(21)"Election" means a regular general election, a municipal general election, a statewide special election, a local special election, a regular primary election, a municipal primary election, and a special district election.(22)"Election Assistance Commission" means the commission established by the Help America Vote Act of 2002, Pub. L. No. 107-252.(23)"Election cycle" means the period beginning on the first day on which individuals are eligible to file declarations of candidacy and ending when the canvass is completed.(24)"Election judge" means a poll worker that is assigned to:(a)preside over other poll workers at a polling place;(b)act as the presiding election judge; or(c)serve as a canvassing judge, counting judge, or receiving judge.(25)"Election material" includes:(a)the verification documentation described in Subsection 20A-3a-401(9)(b)(iv);(b)the list of voters contacted to cure a ballot described in Subsection 20A-3a-401(10)(b);(c)the record of rejected and resolved ballots described in Subsection 20A-3a-401(11)(a);(d)any chain of custody documentation described in Section 20A-3a-401.1, including:(i)the count of ballots described in Subsection 20A-3a-401.1(3); and(ii)the batch log described in Subsection 20A-3a-401.1(5);(e)the record of signature verification audits described in Subsection 20A-3a-402.5(4);(f)the affidavit of compliance described in Subsection 20A-3a-404(2);(g)the physical and electronic log of replicated ballots described in Subsection 20A-4-104(3);(h)the physical or electronic log of adjudicated ballots described in Section 20A-5-802.5;(i)the record of voter database access described in Subsection 20A-5-905(2);(j)the reports on military and overseas voters described in Section 20A-16-202;(k)scanned copies of return envelopes;(l)a copy of the final election results database described in Section 20A-5-802.5; and(m)the materials used in the programming of the automatic tabulating equipment.(26)"Election officer" means:(a)the lieutenant governor, for all statewide ballots and elections;(b)the county clerk for:(i)a county ballot and election; and(ii)a ballot and election as a provider election officer as provided in Section 20A-5-400.1 or 20A-5-400.5;(c)the municipal clerk for:(i)a municipal ballot and election; and(ii)a ballot and election as a provider election officer as provided in Section 20A-5-400.1 or 20A-5-400.5;(d)the special district clerk or chief executive officer for:(i)a special district ballot and election; and(ii)a ballot and election as a provider election officer as provided in Section 20A-5-400.1 or 20A-5-400.5; or(e)the business administrator or superintendent of a school district for:(i)a school district ballot and election; and(ii)a ballot and election as a provider election officer as provided in Section 20A-5-400.1 or 20A-5-400.5.(27)"Election official" means any election officer, election judge, or poll worker.(28)"Election results" means:(a)for an election other than a bond election, the count of votes cast in the election and the election returns requested by the board of canvassers; or(b)for bond elections, the count of those votes cast for and against the bond proposition plus any or all of the election returns that the board of canvassers may request.(29)"Election results database" means the following information generated by voting equipment:(a)one or more electronic files that contains a digital interpretation of each ballot that is counted in an election;(b)a ballot image; and(c)other information related to a ballot that is adjudicated under Section 20A-4-105.(30)"Election returns" means:(a)the pollbook;(b)the military and overseas absentee voter registration and voting certificates;(c)one of the tally sheets;(d)any unprocessed ballots;(e)all counted ballots;(f)all excess ballots;(g)all unused ballots;(h)all spoiled ballots;(i)all ballot disposition forms, including any provisional ballot disposition forms;(j)the final election results database described in Section 20A-5-802.5;(k)all return envelopes;(l)any provisional ballot envelopes; and(m)the total votes cast form.(31)"Electronic signature" means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with a record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the record.(32)"Holiday" means a legal holiday described in Subsections 63G-1-301(1) and (2).(33)"Inactive voter" means a registered voter who is listed as inactive by a county clerk under Subsection 20A-2-505(4)(c)(i) or (ii).(34)"Judicial office" means the office filled by any judicial officer.(35)"Judicial officer" means any justice or judge of a court of record or any county court judge.(36)"Local election" means a regular county election, a regular municipal election, a municipal primary election, a local special election, a special district election, and a bond election.(37)"Local political subdivision" means a county, a municipality, a special district, or a local school district.(38)"Local special election" means a special election called by the governing body of a local political subdivision in which all registered voters of the local political subdivision may vote.(39)"Manual ballot" means a paper document produced by an election officer on which an individual records an individual's vote by directly placing a mark on the paper document using a pen or other marking instrument.(40)"Mechanical ballot" means a record, including a paper record, electronic record, or mechanical record, that:(a)is created via electronic or mechanical means; and(b)records an individual voter's vote cast via a method other than an individual directly placing a mark, using a pen or other marking instrument, to record an individual voter's vote.(41)"Municipal executive" means:(a)the mayor in the council-mayor form of government defined in Section 10-3b-102; or(b)the mayor in the council-manager form of government defined in Subsection 10-3b-103(6).(42)"Municipal general election" means the election held in municipalities and, as applicable, special districts on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of each odd-numbered year for the purposes established in Section 20A-1-202.(43)"Municipal legislative body" means the council of the city or town in any form of municipal government.(44)"Municipal office" means an elective office in a municipality.(45)"Municipal officers" means those municipal officers that are required by law to be elected.(46)"Municipal primary election" means an election held to nominate candidates for municipal office.(47)"Municipality" means a city or town.(48)"Official ballot" means the ballots distributed by the election officer for voters to record their votes.(49)"Official endorsement" means  the information on the ballot that identifies:(a)the ballot as an official ballot;(b)the date of the election; and(c)(i)for a ballot prepared by an election officer other than a county clerk, the facsimile signature required by Subsection 20A-6-401(1)(a)(iii); or(ii)for a ballot prepared by a county clerk, the words required by Subsection 20A-6-301(1)(b)(iii).(50)"Official register" means the official record furnished to election officials by the election officer that contains the information required by Section 20A-5-401.(51)"Political party" means an organization of registered voters that has qualified to participate in an election by meeting the requirements of Chapter 8, Political Party Formation and Procedures.(52)(a)"Poll worker" means a person assigned by an election official to assist with an election, voting, or counting votes.(b)"Poll worker" includes election judges.(c)"Poll worker" does not include a watcher.(53)"Pollbook" means a record of the names of voters in the order that the voters appear to cast votes.(54)"Polling place" means a building where voting is conducted.(55)"Position" means a square, circle, rectangle, or other geometric shape on a ballot in which the voter marks the voter's choice.(56)"Presidential Primary Election" means the election established in Chapter 9, Part 8, Presidential Primary Election.(57)"Primary convention" means the political party conventions held during the year of the regular general election.(58)"Protective counter" means a separate counter, which cannot be reset, that:(a)is built into a voting machine; and(b)records the total number of movements of the operating lever.(59)"Provider election officer" means an election officer who enters into a contract or interlocal agreement with a contracting election officer to conduct an election for the contracting election officer's local political subdivision in accordance with Section 20A-5-400.1.(60)"Provisional ballot" means a ballot voted provisionally by a person:(a)whose name is not listed on the official register at the polling place;(b)whose legal right to vote is challenged as provided in this title; or(c)whose identity was not sufficiently established by a poll worker.(61)"Provisional ballot envelope" means an envelope printed in the form required by Section 20A-6-105 that is used to identify provisional ballots and to provide information to verify a person's legal right to vote.(62)(a)"Public figure" means an individual who, due to the individual being considered for, holding, or having held a position of prominence in a public or private capacity, or due to the individual's celebrity status, has an increased risk to the individual's safety.(b)"Public figure" does not include an individual:(i)elected to public office; or(ii)appointed to fill a vacancy in an elected public office.(63)"Qualify" or "qualified" means to take the oath of office and begin performing the duties of the position for which the individual was elected.(64)"Receiving judge" means the poll worker that checks the voter's name in the official register at a polling place and provides the voter with a ballot.(65)"Registration form" means a form by which an individual may register to vote under this title.(66)"Regular ballot" means a ballot that is not a provisional ballot.(67)"Regular general election" means the election held throughout the state on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of each even-numbered year for the purposes established in Section 20A-1-201.(68)"Regular primary election" means the election, held on the date specified in Section 20A-1-201.5, to nominate candidates of political parties and candidates for nonpartisan local school board positions to advance to the regular general election.(69)"Resident" means a person who resides within a specific voting precinct in Utah.(70)"Return envelope" means the envelope, described in Subsection 20A-3a-202(4), provided to a voter with a manual ballot:(a)into which the voter places the manual ballot after the voter has voted the manual ballot in order to preserve the secrecy of the voter's vote; and(b)that includes the voter affidavit and a place for the voter's signature.(71)"Sample ballot" means a mock ballot similar in form to the official ballot, published as provided in Section 20A-5-405.(72)"Special district" means a local government entity under Title 17B, Limited Purpose Local Government Entities - Special Districts, and includes a special service district under Title 17D, Chapter 1, Special Service District Act.(73)"Special district officers" means those special district board members who are required by law to be elected.(74)"Special election" means an election held as authorized by Section 20A-1-203.(75)"Spoiled ballot" means each ballot that:(a)is spoiled by the voter;(b)is unable to be voted because it was spoiled by the printer or a poll worker; or(c)lacks the official endorsement.(76)"Statewide special election" means a special election called by the governor or the Legislature in which all registered voters in Utah may vote.(77)"Tabulation system" means a device or system designed for the sole purpose of tabulating votes cast by voters at an election.(78)"Ticket" means  a list of:(a)political parties;(b)candidates for an office; or(c)ballot propositions.(79)"Transfer case" means the sealed box used to transport voted ballots to the counting center.(80)"Vacancy" means:(a)except as provided in Subsection (80)(b), the absence of an individual to serve in a position created by state constitution or state statute, whether that absence occurs because of death, disability, disqualification, resignation, or other cause; or(b)in relation to a candidate for a position created by state constitution or state statute, the removal of a candidate due to the candidate's death, resignation, or disqualification.(81)"Valid voter identification" means:(a)a form of identification that bears the name and photograph of the voter which may include:(i)a currently valid Utah driver license;(ii)a currently valid identification card issued under Title 53, Chapter 3, Part 8, Identification Card Act;(iii)a currently valid identification card that is issued by:(A)the state; or(B)a branch, department, or agency of the United States;(iv)a currently valid Utah permit to carry a concealed weapon;(v)a currently valid United States passport; or(vi)a currently valid United States military identification card;(b)one of the following identification cards, regardless of whether the card includes a photograph of the voter:(i)a valid tribal identification card;(ii)a Bureau of Indian Affairs card; or(iii)a tribal treaty card; or(c)two forms of identification not listed under Subsection (81)(a) or (b) but that bear the name of the voter and provide evidence that the voter resides in the voting precinct, which may include:(i)before January 1, 2029, an original or copy of a current utility bill, dated no more than 90 calendar days before the date of the election;(ii)before January 1, 2029, an original or copy of a bank or other financial account statement, dated no more than 90 calendar days before the date of the election;(iii)a certified birth certificate;(iv)a valid social security card;(v)an original or copy of a check issued by the state or the federal government, dated no more than 90 calendar days before the date of the election;(vi)an original or copy of a paycheck from the voter's employer, dated no more than 90 calendar days before the date of the election;(vii)a currently valid Utah hunting or fishing license;(viii)certified naturalization documentation;(ix)a currently valid license issued by an authorized agency of the United States;(x)a certified copy of court records showing the voter's adoption or name change;(xi)a valid Medicaid card, Medicare card, or Electronic Benefits Transfer Cardcard;(xii)a currently valid identification card issued by:(A)a local government within the state;(B)an employer for an employee; or(C)a college, university, technical school, or professional school located within the state; or(xiii)a current Utah vehicle registration.(82)"Valid write-in candidate" means a candidate who has qualified as a write-in candidate by following the procedures and requirements of this title.(83)"Vote by mail" means to vote, using a manual ballot that is mailed to the voter, by:(a)mailing the ballot to the location designated in the mailing; or(b)depositing the ballot in a ballot drop box designated by the election officer.(84)"Voter" means an individual who:(a)meets the requirements for voting in an election;(b)meets the requirements of election registration;(c)is registered to vote; and(d)is listed in the official register.(85)"Voter registration deadline" means the registration deadline provided in Section 20A-2-102.5.(86)"Voting area" means the area within six feet of the voting booths, voting machines, and ballot box.(87)"Voting booth" means:(a)the space or compartment within a polling place that is provided for the preparation of ballots, including the voting enclosure or curtain; or(b)a voting device that is free standing.(88)"Voting device" means any device provided by an election officer for a voter to vote a mechanical ballot.(89)"Voting precinct" means the smallest geographical voting unit, established under Chapter 5, Part 3, Duties of the County and Municipal Legislative Bodies.(90)"Watcher" means an individual who complies with the requirements described in Section 20A-3a-801 to become a watcher for an election.(91)"Write-in ballot" means a ballot containing any write-in votes.(92)"Write-in vote" means a vote cast for an individual, whose name is not printed on the ballot, in accordance with the procedures established in this title.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 20A-1-609 is amended to read:20A-1-609Effective 05/06/26. Omnibus penalties.(1)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), a person who violates any provision of this title is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.(b)Subsection (1)(a) does not apply to a provision of this title for which another penalty is expressly stated.(c)An individual is not guilty of a crime for, by signing a petition for an initiative or referendum, falsely making the statement described in Subsection 20A-7-203(3)(d)(xx), 20A-7-303(3)(d)(xx), 20A-7-503(3)(d)(xx), or 20A-7-603(3)(d)(xx)20A-7-203(3)(f)(ii), 20A-7-303(3)(f)(ii), 20A-7-503(3)(f)(ii), or 20A-7-603(3)(f)(ii).(2)Except as provided by Section 20A-2-101.3 or 20A-2-101.5, an individual convicted of any offense under this title may not:(a)file a declaration of candidacy for any office or appear on the ballot as a candidate for any office during the election cycle in which the violation occurred;(b)take or hold the office to which the individual was elected; and(c)receive the emoluments of the office to which the individual was elected.(3)(a)Any individual convicted of any offense under this title forfeits the right to vote at any election unless the right to vote is restored as provided in Section 20A-2-101.3 or 20A-2-101.5.(b)Any person may challenge the right to vote of a person described in Subsection (3)(a) by following the procedures and requirements of Section 20A-3a-803.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 20A-1-1001 is amended to read:20A-1-1001Effective 05/06/26. Definitions.As used in this part:(1)(a)"Clerk" means the lieutenant governor, a county clerk, municipal clerk, town clerk, city recorder, or municipal recorder.(b)"Clerk" includes a board of trustees under Title 17B, Chapter 1, Provisions Applicable to All Special Districts.(2)"Local petition" means:(a)a manual or electronic local initiative petition described in Chapter 7, Part 5, Local Initiatives - Procedures; or(b)a manual or electronic local referendum petition described in Chapter 7, Part 6, Local Referenda - Procedures.(3)"Petition" means one of the following written requests, signed by registered voters, appealing to an authority with respect to a particular cause:(a)a local petition;(b)a petition to consolidate two or more municipalities under Section 10-2-601;(c)a petition for disincorporation of a municipality under Section 10-2-701;(d)a petition to incorporate a proposed municipality under Section 10-2a-208;(e)a petition to consolidate adjoining counties under Section 17-61-201;(f)a petition to annex a portion of a county to an adjoining county under Section 17-61-301;(g)a petition for the creation of a new county under Section 17-61-401;(h)a petition for the removal of a county seat under Section 17-60-302;(i)a petition for the adoption of an optional plan under Section 17-62-303;(j)a petition for the repeal of an optional plan under Section 17-62-505;(k)a petition to create a special district under Section 17B-1-203;(l)a petition to withdraw an area from a special district under Section 17B-1-504;(m)a petition to dissolve a special district under Section 17B-1-1303;(n)a petition for issuance of local building authority bonds under Section 17D-2-502;(o)a petition to become a registered political party under Section 20A-8-103;(p)a nomination petition for municipal office under Section 20A-9-203;(q)a nomination petition for a regular primary election under Subsection 20A-9-403(3)(a) and Section 20A-9-405;(r)a petition for a political party to qualify as a municipal political party under Section 20A-9-404;(s)a petition for the nomination of a qualified political party under Section 20A-9-408;(t)a nomination petition for a candidate not affiliated with a political party under Section 20A-9-502;(u)a nomination petition to become a delegate to a ratification convention under Section 20A-15-103;(v)a petition to create a new school district under Section 53G-3-301;(w)a petition to consolidate school districts under Section 53G-3-401;(x)a petition to transfer a portion of a school district to another district under Section 53G-3-501;(y)a petition to determine whether a privatization project agreement should be approved under Section 73-10d-4; or(z)a statewide petition.(4)"Petition packet" means:(a)a candidate signature packet, as defined in Section 20A-9-401.1;(b)an initiative packet, as defined in Section 20A-7-101;(c)a referendum packet, as defined in Section 20A-7-101; or(d)any other packet of signature sheets that:(i)is bound together and circulated to gather signatures for a petition; and(ii)includes a cover sheet at the front of the packet and a circulator verification sheet at the end of the packet.(4)(5)"Statewide petition" means:(a)a manual or electronic statewide initiative petition described in Chapter 7, Part 2, Statewide Initiatives; or(b)a manual or electronic statewide referendum petition described in Chapter 7, Part 3, Statewide Referenda.(5)(6)(a)"Substantially similar name" means:(i)the given name, the surname, or both, provided by the individual with the individual's petition signature, contain only minor spelling differences when compared to the given name and surname shown on the official register;(ii)the surname provided by the individual with the individual's petition signature exactly matches the surname shown on the official register, and the given names differ only because one of the given names shown is a commonly used abbreviation or variation of the other;(iii)the surname provided by the individual with the individual's petition signature exactly matches the surname shown on the official register, and the given names differ only because one of the given names shown is accompanied by a first or middle initial or a middle name which is not shown on the other record; or(iv)the surname provided by the individual with the individual's petition signature exactly matches the surname shown on the official register, and the given names differ only because one of the given names shown is an alphabetically corresponding initial that has been provided in the place of a given name shown on the other record.(b)"Substantially similar name" does not include a name having an initial or a middle name provided by the individual with the individual's petition signature that does not match a different initial or middle name shown on the official register.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 20A-1-1002 is amended to read:20A-1-1002Effective 07/01/27. Verification of voter registration -- Electronic notice to petition signer.(1)A clerk shall use the following procedures to determine whether a signer of a petition is a registered voter and to determine the address where the voter is registered to vote:(a)if a signer's name and address provided by the individual with the individual's petition signature exactly match a name and address shown on the official register and the signer's signature appears substantially similar to the signature on the statewide voter registration database, the clerk shall declare the signature valid for the district or jurisdiction in which the signer is registered to vote;(b)if there is no exact match of an address and a name, the clerk shall declare the signature valid for the district or jurisdiction in which the signer is registered to vote, if:(i)the address provided by the individual with the individual's petition signature matches the address of an individual on the official register with a substantially similar name; and(ii)the signer's signature appears substantially similar to the signature on the statewide voter registration database of the individual described in Subsection (1)(b)(i);(c)if there is no match of an address and a substantially similar name, the clerk shall declare the signature valid for the district or jurisdiction in which the signer is registered to vote if:(i)the birth date or age provided by the individual with the individual's petition signature matches the birth date or age of an individual on the official register with a substantially similar name; and(ii)the signer's signature appears substantially similar to the signature on the statewide voter registration database of the individual described in Subsection (1)(c)(i).(2)If a signature is not declared valid under Subsection (1)(a), (b), or (c), the clerk shall declare the signature to be invalid.(3)A clerk shall, within two business days after the day on which the clerk declares a signer's signature valid or invalid under this section, notify the signer of the status of the signer's signature by:(a)sending an email notice to the signer if the signer's information in the voter registration database includes an email address; and(b)sending a text message notice to the signer if:(i)the signer's information in the voter registration database includes a mobile telephone number; and(ii)the signer consented, on the signer's voter registration form, to receive official communications by text at the mobile phone number.(4)The notice described in Subsection (3)(a) shall:(a)include the title "Notice of Signature Verification";(b)identify the name or type of petition the signer signed; and(c)inform the signer that the signer's signature was declared valid or invalid by the clerk.

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 20A-1-1004 is enacted to read:20A-1-1004Effective 05/06/26. Circulator verification sheet -- Rejection of petition packet.(1)The final page of each petition packet shall contain a circulator verification sheet featuring the following printed or typed statement to be completed by the individual who gathers signatures for the petition:VERIFICATION OF SIGNATURE-GATHERERI, _____________________, hereby state, under penalty of perjury, that:I am at least 18 years old;All the names that appear in this petition packet were signed by individuals who professed to be the individuals whose names appear in it, and each of the individuals signed the individual's name on it in my presence or, in the case of an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this petition packet on the individual's behalf, at the direction of the individual and in the individual's presence, by entering the initials "AV" as the individual's signature;I certify that, for each individual whose signature is represented in this petition packet by the initials "AV":I obtained the individual's voluntary direction or consent to sign the petition packet on the individual's behalf;I do not believe and do not have reason to believe that the individual lacked the mental capacity to give direction or consent;I do not believe and do not have reason to believe that the individual did not understand the purpose or nature of my signing the petition packet on the individual's behalf;I did not intentionally or knowingly deceive the individual into directing me to, or consenting for me to, sign the petition packet on the individual's behalf; andI did not intentionally or knowingly enter false information on the signature sheet;I did not knowingly make a misrepresentation of fact related to this petition;I believe that each individual's name and address is written correctly, that each signer has had an opportunity to read all the information contained in the petition, and that each signer is or will be registered to vote in Utah at the time the petition packet is submitted for verification;The correct date of signature appears next to each individual's name;I have not paid or given anything of value to any individual who signed this petition packet to encourage that individual to sign it;I understand that if I have been or will be paid to gather signatures for this petition, my compensation must be based on an hourly rate if the petition is an initiative or referendum petition, or on an hourly rate or rate per valid signature if the petition is another type of petition.I completed the signature gatherer training available on the lieutenant governor's website at www.vote.utah.gov before gathering signatures for this petition. Yes ____ No ____ (Check one)________________________________________________________________________________________________(Printed Name)                            (Signature)                            (Residence Address)                                                 (Date)  (2)A clerk shall reject a petition packet if:(a)all or any portion of the circulator verification sheet described in this section is not completed by the individual who gathered signatures for the petition; or(b)the individual who gathered signatures for the petition checked "No" in response to the signature gatherer training statement.

Section 6:
Section 6. Section 20A-1-1005 is enacted to read:20A-1-1005Effective 05/06/26. Online training for signature gatherers.(1)The lieutenant governor shall develop and maintain an online training course to educate individuals who collect signatures for a petition.(2)The training course shall:(a)inform signature gatherers of the requirements, restrictions, and procedures that apply to the circulation of petitions and collection of signatures, including information about:(i)collecting a signature from an individual with a disability; and(ii)electronic signature gathering;(b)emphasize compliance with the requirements, restrictions, and procedures described in Subsection (2)(a);(c)highlight the potential for criminal penalties for knowingly or intentionally falsifying, misrepresenting, or otherwise violating applicable law in the circulation of a petition and collection of signatures; and(d)recommend best practices for individuals who gather signatures for a petition.(3)The lieutenant governor shall make the training course described in Subsection (2) available on the lieutenant governor's website.(4)An individual may not gather signatures for a petition unless the individual has, before collecting any signatures, completed the online training course described in this section.

Section 7:
Section 7. Section 20A-7-101 is amended to read:20A-7-101Effective 05/06/26. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Approved device" means a device described in Subsection 20A-21-201(4) used to gather signatures for the electronic initiative process, the electronic referendum process, or the electronic candidate qualification process. (2)"Budget officer" means:(a)for a county, the person designated as finance officer as defined in Section 17-63-101;(b)for a city, the person designated as budget officer in Subsection 10-6-106(4); or(c)for a town, the town council.(3)"Certified" means that the county clerk has acknowledged a signature as being the signature of a registered voter.(4)"Circulation" means the process of submitting an initiative petition or a referendum petition to legal voters for their signature.(5)"Condensed initiative packet" means the following components, all of which are bound together as a unit in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-204(5)(b), for a statewide initiative, or Subsection 20A-7-504(5)(b), for a local initiative:(a)a copy of the initiative petition;(b)the signature sheets; and(c)the circulator verification sheet described in Subsection 20A-1-1004(1).(6)"Condensed referendum packet" means the following components, all of which are bound together as a unit in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-304(5)(b), for a statewide referendum, or Subsection 20A-7-604(5)(b), for a local referendum:(a)a copy of the referendum petition;(b)the signature sheets; and(c)the circulator verification sheet described in Subsection 20A-1-1004(1).(5)(7)"Electronic initiative process" means:(a)as it relates to a statewide initiative, the process, described in Sections 20A-7-215 and 20A-21-201, for gathering signatures; or(b)as it relates to a local initiative, the process, described in Sections 20A-7-514 and 20A-21-201, for gathering signatures.(6)(8)"Electronic referendum process" means:(a)as it relates to a statewide referendum, the process, described in Sections 20A-7-313 and 20A-21-201, for gathering signatures; or(b)as it relates to a local referendum, the process, described in Sections 20A-7-614 and 20A-21-201, for gathering signatures.(7)(9)"Eligible voter" means a legal voter who resides in the jurisdiction of the county, city, or town that is holding an election on a ballot proposition.(8)(10)"Final fiscal impact statement" means a financial statement prepared after voters approve an initiative that contains the information required by Subsection 20A-7-202.5(2) or 20A-7-502.5(2).(9)(11)"Initial fiscal impact statement" means a financial statement prepared under Section 20A-7-202.5 after the filing of a statewide initiative application.(10)(12)"Initial fiscal impact and legal statement" means a financial and legal statement prepared under Section 20A-7-502.5 or 20A-7-602.5 for a local initiative or a local referendum.(11)(13)"Initiative" means a new law proposed for adoption by the public as provided in this chapter.(12)(14)"Initiative application" means:(a)for a statewide initiative, an application described in Subsection 20A-7-202(2) that includes all the information, statements, documents, and notarized signatures required under Subsection 20A-7-202(2); or(b)for a local initiative, an application described in Subsection 20A-7-502(2) that includes all the information, statements, documents, and notarized signatures required under Subsection 20A-7-502(2).(13)(15)"Initiative packet" means a copy of the initiative petition, a copy of the proposed law, and the signature sheets, all of which have been bound together as a unit.:(a)a traditional initiative packet; or(b)a condensed initiative packet.(14)(16)"Initiative petition":(a)as it relates to a statewide initiative, using the manual initiative process:(i)means the form described in Subsection 20A-7-203(2)(a), petitioning for submission of the initiative to the Legislature or the legal voters; and(ii)if the initiative proposes a tax increase, includes the statement described in Subsection 20A-7-203(2)(b);, if the initiative proposes a tax increase; and(iii)includes the statement described in Subsection 20A-7-203(2)(c), if:(A)the initiative proposes a law other than a tax increase; and(B)the form described in Subsection 20A-7-203(2)(a) is part of a condensed initiative packet;(b)as it relates to a statewide initiative, using the electronic initiative process:(i)means the form described in Subsections 20A-7-215(2) and (3), petitioning for submission of the initiative to the Legislature or the legal voters; and(ii)if the initiative proposes a tax increase, includes the statement described in Subsection 20A-7-215(5)(b);(c)as it relates to a local initiative, using the manual initiative process:(i)means the form described in Subsection 20A-7-503(2)(a), petitioning for submission of the initiative to the legislative body or the legal voters; and(ii)if the initiative proposes a tax increase, includes the statement described in Subsection 20A-7-503(2)(b);, if the initiative proposes a tax increase; and(iii)includes the statement described in Subsection 20A-7-503(2)(c), if:(A)the initiative proposes a law other than a tax increase; and(B)the form described in Subsection 20A-7-503(2)(a) is part of a condensed initiative packet; or(d)as it relates to a local initiative, using the electronic initiative process:(i)means the form described in Subsection 20A-7-514(2)(a), petitioning for submission of the initiative to the legislative body or the legal voters; and(ii)if the initiative proposes a tax increase, includes the statement described in Subsection 20A-7-514(4)(a).(15)(17)(a)"Land use law" means a law of general applicability, enacted based on the weighing of broad, competing policy considerations, that relates to the use of land, including a land use regulation, a general plan, a land use development code, an annexation ordinance, the rezoning of a single property or multiple properties, or a comprehensive zoning ordinance or resolution.(b)"Land use law" does not include a land use decision, as defined in Section 10-20-102 or 17-79-102.(16)(18)"Legal signatures" means the number of signatures of legal voters that:(a)meet the numerical requirements of this chapter; and(b)have been obtained, certified, and verified as provided in this chapter.(17)(19)"Legal voter" means an individual who is registered to vote in Utah.(18)(20)"Legally referable to voters" means:(a)for a proposed local initiative, that the proposed local initiative is legally referable to voters under Section 20A-7-502.7; or(b)for a proposed local referendum, that the proposed local referendum is legally referable to voters under Section 20A-7-602.7.(19)(21)"Local attorney" means the county attorney, city attorney, or town attorney in whose jurisdiction a local initiative or referendum petition is circulated.(20)(22)"Local clerk" means the county clerk, city recorder, or town clerk in whose jurisdiction a local initiative or referendum petition is circulated.(21)(23)(a)"Local law" includes:(i)an ordinance;(ii)a resolution;(iii)a land use law;(iv)a land use regulation, as defined in Section 10-20-102; or(v)other legislative action of a local legislative body.(b)"Local law" does not include a land use decision, as defined in Section 10-20-102.(22)(24)"Local legislative body" means the legislative body of a county, city, or town.(23)(25)"Local obligation law" means a local law passed by the local legislative body regarding a bond that was approved by a majority of qualified voters in an election.(24)(26)"Local tax law" means a law, passed by a political subdivision with an annual or biannual calendar fiscal year, that increases a tax or imposes a new tax.(25)(27)"Manual initiative process" means the process for gathering signatures for an initiative using paper signature packets that a signer physically signs.(26)(28)"Manual referendum process" means the process for gathering signatures for a referendum using paper signature packets that a signer physically signs.(27)(29)(a)"Measure" means a proposed constitutional amendment, an initiative, or referendum.(b)"Measure" does not include a ballot proposition for the creation of a new school district under Section 53G-3-301.1, 53G-3-301.3, or 53G-3-301.4.(28)(30)"Presiding officers" means the president of the Senate and the speaker of the House of Representatives.(29)(31)"Referendum" means a process by which a law passed by the Legislature or by a local legislative body is submitted or referred to the voters for their approval or rejection.(30)(32)"Referendum application" means:(a)for a statewide referendum, an application described in Subsection 20A-7-302(2) that includes all the information, statements, documents, and notarized signatures required under Subsection 20A-7-302(2); or(b)for a local referendum, an application described in Subsection 20A-7-602(2) that includes all the information, statements, documents, and notarized signatures required under Subsection 20A-7-602(2).(31)(33)"Referendum packet" means a copy of the referendum petition, a copy of the law being submitted or referred to the voters for their approval or rejection, and the signature sheets, all of which have been bound together as a unit.:(a)a traditional referendum packet; or(b)a condensed referendum packet.(32)(34)"Referendum petition" means:(a)as it relates to a statewide referendum, using the manual referendum process, the form described in Subsection 20A-7-303(2)(a)20A-7-303(2), petitioning for submission of a law passed by the Legislature to legal voters for their approval or rejection;(b)as it relates to a statewide referendum, using the electronic referendum process, the form described in Subsection 20A-7-313(2), petitioning for submission of a law passed by the Legislature to legal voters for their approval or rejection;(c)as it relates to a local referendum, using the manual referendum process, the form described in Subsection 20A-7-603(2)(a)20A-7-603(2), petitioning for submission of a local law to legal voters for their approval or rejection; or(d)as it relates to a local referendum, using the electronic referendum process, the form described in Subsection 20A-7-614(2), petitioning for submission of a local law to legal voters for their approval or rejection.(33)(35)"Signature":(a)for a statewide initiative:(i)as it relates to the electronic initiative process, means an electronic signature collected under Section 20A-7-215 and Subsection 20A-21-201(6)(c); or(ii)as it relates to the manual initiative process:(A)means a holographic signature collected physically on a signature sheet described in Section 20A-7-203;(B)as it relates to an individual who, due to a qualifying disability under the Americans with Disabilities Act, is unable to fill out the signature sheet or to sign the voter's name consistently, the initials "AV," indicating that the voter's identity will be verified by an alternate verification process described in Section 20A-7-106; and(C)does not include an electronic signature;(b)for a statewide referendum:(i)as it relates to the electronic referendum process, means an electronic signature collected under Section 20A-7-313 and Subsection 20A-21-201(6)(c); or(ii)as it relates to the manual referendum process:(A)means a holographic signature collected physically on a signature sheet described in Section 20A-7-303;(B)as it relates to an individual who, due to a qualifying disability under the Americans with Disabilities Act, is unable to fill out the signature sheet or to sign the voter's name consistently, the initials "AV," indicating that the voter's identity will be verified by an alternate verification process described in Section 20A-7-106; and(C)does not include an electronic signature;(c)for a local initiative:(i)as it relates to the electronic initiative process, means an electronic signature collected under Section 20A-7-514 and Subsection 20A-21-201(6)(c); or(ii)as it relates to the manual initiative process:(A)means a holographic signature collected physically on a signature sheet described in Section 20A-7-503;(B)as it relates to an individual who, due to a qualifying disability under the Americans with Disabilities Act, is unable to fill out the signature sheet or to sign the voter's name consistently, the initials "AV," indicating that the voter's identity will be verified by an alternate verification process described in Section 20A-7-106; and(C)does not include an electronic signature; or(d)for a local referendum:(i)as it relates to the electronic referendum process, means an electronic signature collected under Section 20A-7-614 and Subsection 20A-21-201(6)(c); or(ii)as it relates to the manual referendum process:(A)means a holographic signature collected physically on a signature sheet described in Section 20A-7-603;(B)as it relates to an individual who, due to a qualifying disability under the Americans with Disabilities Act, is unable to fill out the signature sheet or to sign the voter's name consistently, the initials "AV," indicating that the voter's identity will be verified by an alternate verification process described in Section 20A-7-106; and(C)does not include an electronic signature.(34)(36)"Signature sheets" means sheets in the form required by this chapter that are used under the manual initiative process or the manual referendum process to collect signatures in support of an initiative or referendum.(35)(37)"Special local ballot proposition" means a local ballot proposition that is not a standard local ballot proposition.(38)(a)"Sponsor liaison" means an individual designated by the sponsors of an initiative or referendum to:(i)receive communications from Office of the Lieutenant Governor; and(ii)communicate with and act on behalf of the sponsors regarding the initiative or referendum.(b)"Sponsor liaison" includes a sponsor or another individual designated by the sponsors.(36)(39)"Sponsors" means the legal voters who support the initiative or referendum and who sign the initiative application or referendum application.(37)(40)(a)"Standard local ballot proposition" means a local ballot proposition for an initiative or a referendum.(b)"Standard local ballot proposition" does not include a property tax referendum described in Section 20A-7-613.(41)"Traditional initiative packet" means the following components, all of which are bound together as a unit in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-204(5)(b), for a statewide initiative, or Subsection 20A-7-504(5)(b), for a local initiative:(a)a copy of:(i)the initiative petition; and(ii)the law proposed by the initiative petition;(b)the signature sheets; and(c)the circulator verification sheet described in Subsection 20A-1-1004(1).(42)"Traditional referendum packet" means the following components, all of which are bound together as a unit in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-304(5)(b), for a statewide referendum, or Subsection 20A-7-604(5)(b), for a local referendum:(a)a copy of:(i)the referendum petition; and(ii)the law being submitted or referred to the voters for approval or rejection;(b)the signature sheets; and(c)the circulator verification sheet described in Subsection 20A-1-1004(1).(38)(43)"Tax percentage difference" means the difference between the tax rate proposed by an initiative or an initiative petition and the current tax rate.(39)(44)"Tax percentage increase" means a number calculated by dividing the tax percentage difference by the current tax rate and rounding the result to the nearest thousandth.(40)(45)"Verified" means acknowledged by the person circulating the petition as required in Section 20A-7-105.

Section 8:
Section 8. Section 20A-7-104 is amended to read:20A-7-104Effective 05/06/26. Signature gatherers -- Payments -- Badges -- Information -- Requirement to provide initiative or referendum for reading.(1)A person may not pay a person to gather signatures under this chapter based on a rate per signature, on a rate per verified signature, or on the initiative or referendum qualifying for the ballot.unless the payment is based on an hourly rate.(2)A person that pays a person to gather signatures under this section shall base the payment solely on an hourly rate.(3)(2)A person may not accept payment made in violation of this section.(4)(3)An individual who is paid to gather signatures for a petition described in this chapter shall, while gathering signatures, wear a badge on the front of the individual's torso that complies with the following, ensuring that the information on the badge is clearly visible to the individual from whom a signature is sought:(a)the badge shall be printed in black ink on white cardstock and laminated; and(b)the information on the badge shall be in at least 24-point type and include the following information:(i)an identification number that is unique to the individual gathering signatures, assigned by:(A)for a statewide initiative or referendum, the lieutenant governor; or(B)for a local initiative or referendum, the local clerk;(ii)the title of the initiative or referendum;(iii)the words "Paid Signature Gatherer"; and(iv)the name of the entity paying the signature gatherer.(5)(4)An individual who gathers signatures under this chapter shall offer a paper document to each individual who signs the petition that:(a)is printed in black ink on white paper, white cardstock, or a white sticker, in at least 12-point type; and(b)(i)for an initiative, includes the name of the initiative and the following statement:"You may view the initiative, its fiscal impact, and information on removing your signature from the petition at [list a uniform resource locator that links directly to the information described in Section 20A-7-202.7 or 20A-7-502.6, as applicable]."; or(ii)for a referendum, includes the name of the referendum and the following statement:"You may view the referendum and information on removing your signature from the petition at [list a uniform resource locator that links directly to the information described in Section 20A-7-304.5 or 20A-7-604.5, as applicable]."(6)(5)An individual who gathers signatures under this chapter shall, before collecting a signature from an individual, present to the individual a printed or digital copy of the initiative or referendum and wait for the individual to read the initiative or referendum.(7)(6)A person who violates this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Section 9:
Section 9. Section 20A-7-105 is amended to read:20A-7-105Effective 05/06/26. Manual petition processes -- Obtaining signatures -- Verification -- Submitting the petition -- Certification of signatures -- Transfer to lieutenant governor -- Removal of signature.(1)This section applies only to the manual initiative process and the manual referendum process.(2)As used in this section:(a)"Local petition" means:(i)a manual local initiative petition described in Part 5, Local Initiatives - Procedures; or(ii)a manual local referendum petition described in Part 6, Local Referenda - Procedures.(b)"Packet" means an initiative packet or referendum packet.(c)"Petition" means a local petition or statewide petition.(d)"Statewide petition" means:(i)a manual statewide initiative petition described in Part 2, Statewide Initiatives; or(ii)a manual statewide referendum petition described in Part 3, Statewide Referenda.(3)(a)A Utah voter may sign a statewide petition if the voter is a legal voter.(b)A Utah voter may sign a local petition if the voter:(i)is a legal voter; and(ii)resides in the local jurisdiction.(4)(a)The sponsors shall ensure that the individual in whose presence each signature sheet was signed:(i)is at least 18 years old;(ii)verifies each signature sheet by completing the verification printed on the last page of each packet; and(iii)is informed that each signer is required to read and understand:that, before signing a signature sheet, a signer is required to have an opportunity to read and understand:(A)for an initiative petition, the law proposed by the initiative; or(B)for a referendum petition, the law that the referendum seeks to overturn.(b)An individual may not sign the verification printed on the last page of a packet if the individual signed a signature sheet in the packet.(5)(a)The sponsors, or an agent of the sponsors, shall submit a signed and verified packet to the county clerk of the county in which the packet was circulated before 5 p.m. no later than the earlier of:(i)for a statewide initiative:(A)the first business day that is at least 30 calendar days after the day on which the first individual signs the initiative packet;(B)the last business day that is no more than 316 calendar days after the day on which the application for the initiative petition is filed; or(C)the February 15 immediately before the next regular general election immediately after the application is filed under Section 20A-7-202;(ii)for a statewide referendum:(A)the first business day that is at least 30 calendar days after the day on which the first individual signs the referendum packet; or(B)the first business day that is at least 40 calendar  days after the day on which the legislative session at which the law passed ends;(iii)for a local initiative:(A)the first business day that is at least 30 calendar days after the day on which the first individual signs the initiative packet;(B)the last business day that is no more than 316 calendar days after the day on which the application is filed;(C)the April 15 immediately before the next regular general election immediately after the application is filed under Section 20A-7-502, if the local initiative is a county initiative; or(D)the April 15 immediately before the next municipal general election immediately after the application is filed under Section 20A-7-502, if the local initiative is a municipal initiative; or(iv)for a local referendum:(A)the first business day that is at least 30 calendar days after the day on which the first individual signs the referendum packet; or(B)the first business day that is at least 45 calendar days after the day on which the sponsors receive the items described in Subsection 20A-7-604(3) from the local clerk.(b)A person may not submit a packet after the applicable deadline described in Subsection (5)(a)A person may not mark, redact, or otherwise alter a signature sheet in a manner that obscures, conceals, or renders illegible a signer's date of signature or other information provided by the signer that is used for verification under this section.(c)Before delivering an initiative packet to the county clerk under this Subsection (5), the sponsors shall send an email to each individual who provides a legible, valid email address on the signature sheet that includes the following:(i)the subject of the email shall include the following statement, "Notice Regarding Your Petition Signature"; and(ii)the body of the email shall include the following statement in 12-point type:"You signed a petition for the following initiative:[insert title of initiative]To access a copy of the initiative petition, the initiative, the fiscal impact statement, and information on the deadline for removing your signature from the petition, please visit the following link: [insert a uniform resource locator that takes the individual directly to the page on the lieutenant governor's or county clerk's website that includes the information referred to in the email]."(d)For a statewide initiative, the sponsors shall, no later than 5 p.m. on the day on which the sponsors submit the last initiative packet to the county clerk, submit to the lieutenant governor:(i)a list containing:(A)the name and email address of each individual the sponsors sent, or caused to be sent, the email described in Subsection (5)(c); and(B)the date the email was sent;(ii)a copy of the email described in Subsection (5)(c); and(iii)the following written verification, completed and signed by each of the sponsors:"Verification of initiative sponsor State of Utah, County of __________I, __________, of __________, hereby state, under penalty of perjury, that:I am a sponsor of the initiative petition entitled ____________________; andI sent, or caused to be sent, to each individual who provided a legible, valid email address on a signature sheet submitted to the county clerk in relation to the initiative petition, the email described in Utah Code Subsection 20A-7-105(5)(c).______________________________________________________________ _______________________(Name)(Printed Name)                      (Signature) (Residence Address)(Date)".(e)For a local initiative, the sponsors shall, no later than 5 p.m. on the day on which the sponsors submit the last initiative packet to the local clerk, submit to the local clerk the items described in Subsection (5)(d).(f)Signatures gathered for an initiative petition are not valid if the sponsors do not comply with Subsection (5)(c), (d), or (e).(6)(a)Within 21 calendar days after the day on which the county clerk receives the packet, the county clerk shall:(i)use the procedures described in Section 20A-1-1002, or 20A-7-106 if applicable, to determine whether each signer is a legal voter and, as applicable, the jurisdiction where the signer is registered to vote;(ii)for a statewide initiative or a statewide referendum:(A)certify on the petition whether each name is that of a legal voter; and(B)post the name, voter identification number, and date of signature of each legal voterthe date the signature of each legal voter was certified under Subsection (6)(a)(ii)(A) on the lieutenant governor's website, in a conspicuous location designated by the lieutenant governor; and(C)deliver the verified packet to the lieutenant governor;(iii)for a local initiative or a local referendum:(A)certify on the petition whether each name is that of a legal voter who is registered in the jurisdiction to which the initiative or referendum relates;(B)post the name, voter identification number, and date of signature of each legal voter certified under Subsection (6)(a)(iii)(A) on the lieutenant governor's website, in a conspicuous location designated by the lieutenant governor; and(C)deliver the verified packet to the local clerk.(b)(i)For a statewide initiative or statewide referendum, the county clerk shall, no later than seven calendar days after the last day the county clerk makes the posting described in Subsection (6)(a)(ii)(B), certify the following information to the lieutenant governor:(A)the total number of verified packets in the county clerk's possession;(B)the total number of signatures verified by the county clerk;(C)of the number described in Subsection (6)(b)(i)(B), the number of signatures the county clerk declared valid and invalid under Section 20A-1-1002; and(D)a breakdown of the number of invalid signatures, categorized by the reason for the invalidity; and(ii)After a county clerk sends the certification described in Subsection (6)(b)(i) to the lieutenant governor, the county clerk shall retain and preserve each verified packet in the manner described in Subsection 20A-4-202(2).(c)For a local initiative or local referendum, the local clerk shall post a link in a conspicuous location on the local government's website to the posting described in Subsection (6)(a)(iii)(B):(i)for a local initiative, during the period of time described in Subsection 20A-7-507(3)(a); or(ii)for a local referendum, during the period of time described in Subsection 20A-7-607(2)(a)(i).(7)The county clerk may not certify a signature under Subsection (6)(6)(a):(a)on a packet that is not verified in accordance with Subsection (4)(4)(a)(ii); or(b)that does not have a date of signature next to the signature.; or(c)if the date of signature is later than the applicable deadline described in Subsection (5)(a).(8)Beginning on January 1, 2027, an election officer shall, within two business days after the day on which the county clerk determines the signer of an initiative is a legal voter eligible to sign a signature sheet, send the following email notice to the signer if the signer's voter registration record includes a valid email address:(a)the subject of the email shall include the following statement, "Notice Regarding Your Petition Signature"; and(b)the body of the email shall include the following statement in 12-point type:"You signed a petition for the following initiative:[insert title of initiative]To access a copy of the initiative petition, the initiative, the fiscal impact statement, and information on the deadline for removing your signature from the petition, please visit the following link: [insert a uniform resource locator that takes the individual directly to the page on the lieutenant governor's or county clerk's website that includes the information referred to in the email]."(8)(9)(a)A voter who signs a statewide initiative petition may have the voter's signature removed from the petition by, in accordance with Section 20A-1-1003, submitting to the county clerk a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed no later than 5 p.m. the earlier of:(i)for an initiative packet received by the county clerk before December 1:(A)the first business day that is at least 30 calendar days after the day on which the voter signs the signature removal statement; or(B)the first business day that is at least 90 calendar days after the day on which the lieutenant governor posts the voter's name under Subsection 20A-7-207(2); or(ii)for an initiative packet received by the county clerk on or after December 1:(A)the first business day that is at least 30 calendar days after the day on which the voter signs the signature removal statement; or(B)the first business day that is at least 45 calendar days after the day on which the lieutenant governor posts the voter's name under Subsection 20A-7-207(2).(b)A voter who signs a statewide referendum petition may have the voter's signature removed from the petition by, in accordance with Section 20A-1-1003, submitting to the county clerk a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed no later than 5 p.m. the earlier of:(i)the first business day that is at least 30 calendar days after the day on which the voter signs the statement requesting removal; or(ii)the first business day that is at least 45 calendar days after the day on which the lieutenant governor posts the voter's name under Subsection 20A-7-307(2).(c)A voter who signs a local initiative petition may have the voter's signature removed from the petition by, in accordance with Section 20A-1-1003, submitting to the county clerk a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed no later than 5 p.m. the earlier of:(i)the first business day that is at least 30 calendar days after the day on which the voter signs the signature removal statement;(ii)the first business day that is at least 90 calendar days after the day on which the local clerk posts the voter's name under Subsection 20A-7-507(2);(iii)the last business day that is no more than 316 calendar days after the day on which the application is filed; or(iv)(A)for a county initiative, April 15 immediately before the next regular general election immediately after the application is filed under Section 20A-7-502; or(B)for a municipal initiative, April 15 immediately before the next municipal general election immediately after the application is filed under Section 20A-7-502.(d)A voter who signs a local referendum petition may have the voter's signature removed from the petition by, in accordance with Section 20A-1-1003, submitting to the county clerk a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed no later than 5 p.m. the earlier of:(i)the first business day that is at least 30 calendar days after the day on which the voter signs the statement requesting removal; or(ii)the first business day that is at least 45 calendar days after the day on which the local clerk posts the voter's name under Subsection 20A-7-607(2)(a).(e)In order for the signature to be removed, the county clerk must receive the statement described in this Subsection (8)(9) before 5 p.m. no later than the applicable deadline described in this Subsection (8)(9).(f)A county clerk shall analyze a signature, for purposes of removing a signature from a petition, in accordance with Subsection 20A-1-1003(3).(9)(10)(a)If the county clerk timely receives a statement requesting signature removal under Subsection (8)(9) and determines that the signature should be removed from the petition under Subsection 20A-1-1003(3), the county clerk shall:(i)ensure that the voter's name, voter identification number, and date of signature are not included in the posting described in Subsection (6)(a)(ii)(B) or (iii)(B); and(ii)remove the voter's signature from the signature packets and signature packet totals.(b)The county clerk shall comply with Subsection (9)(a)(10)(a) before the later of:(i)the deadline described in Subsection (6)(a); or(ii)two business days after the day on which the county clerk receives a statement requesting signature removal under Subsection (8)(9).(10)(11)A person may not retrieve a packet from a county clerk, or make any alterations or corrections to a packet, after the packet is submitted to the county clerk.

Section 10:
Section 10. Section 20A-7-201 is amended to read:20A-7-201Effective 05/06/26. Statewide initiatives -- Signature requirements -- Submission to the Legislature or to a vote of the people.(1)(a)A person seeking to have an initiative submitted to the Legislature for approval or rejection shall, after filing an initiative application, obtain:(i)legal signatures equal to 4% of the number of active voters in the state on January 1 immediately following the last regular general election; and(ii)from at least 26 Utah State Senate districts, legal signatures equal to 4% of the number of active voters in that district on January 1 immediately following the last regular general election.(b)If, at any time not less than 10 calendar days before the beginning of the next annual general session of the Legislature, the lieutenant governor declares that an initiative petition designated under Subsection 20A-7-202(2)(c)(i)20A-7-202(2)(d)(i) for submission to the Legislature is signed by a sufficient number of voters to meet the requirements of Subsection (1)(a), the lieutenant governor shall deliver a copy of the initiative petition, the text of the proposed law, and the cover sheet described in Subsection (1)(c) to the president of the Senate, the speaker of the House, and the director of the Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel.(c)The lieutenant governor shall prepare a cover sheet for a petition declared sufficient under Subsection (1)(b) that contains:(i)the number of active voters in the state on January 1 immediately following the last regular general election;(ii)the number of active voters in each Utah State Senate district on January 1 immediately following the last regular general election;(iii)the total number of certified signatures obtained for the initiative petition; and(iv)the total number of certified signatures obtained from each Utah State Senate district for the initiative petition.(2)(a)A person seeking to have an initiative submitted to a vote of the people for approval or rejection shall, after filing an initiative application, obtain:(i)legal signatures equal to 8% of the number of active voters in the state on January 1 immediately following the last regular general election; and(ii)from at least 26 Utah State Senate districts, legal signatures equal to 8% of the number of active voters in that district on January 1 immediately following the last regular general election.(b)If an initiative petition meets the requirements of this part and the lieutenant governor declares that the initiative petition is signed by a sufficient number of voters to meet the requirements of Subsection (2)(a), the lieutenant governor shall submit the proposed law to a vote of the people at the next regular general election:(i)immediately after the application is filed under Section 20A-7-202; and(ii)specified on the petition under Section 20A-7-203.(3)The lieutenant governor shall provide the following information to any interested person:(a)the number of active voters in the state on January 1 immediately following the last regular general election; and(b)for each Utah State Senate district, the number of active voters in that district on January 1 immediately following the last regular general election.

Section 11:
Section 11. Section 20A-7-202 is amended to read:20A-7-202Effective 05/06/26. Statewide initiative process -- Initiative application procedures -- Time to gather signatures -- Grounds for rejection.(1)Individuals wishing to circulate an initiative petition shall file an initiative application with the lieutenant governor.(2)The initiative application shall include:(a)the name and residence address of at least five sponsors of the initiative petition;(b)a statement indicating that each of the sponsors is registered to vote in Utah;(c)a statement designating a sponsor liaison, including the sponsor liaison's name, residence address, telephone number, and email address;(c)(d)a statement indicating whether the initiative will be presented to:(i)the Legislature under Subsection 20A-7-201(1); or(ii)a vote of the people under Subsection 20A-7-201(2);(d)(e)the signature of each of the sponsors, attested to by a notary public; and(e)(f)the following, in the following order:(i)the title of the proposed law that clearly expresses the subject of the law;(ii)except as provided in Subsection (3)(c), a description of the manner in which the proposed law will be funded, including:(A)all proposed sources of funding for the costs associated with the proposed law, including the proposed percentage of total funding from each source;(B)if the proposed law will be funded, in whole or in part, by a new tax, a description of the new tax and the tax rate;(C)if the proposed law will be funded, in whole or in part, by a tax increase, the following statement for each tax increase, "This initiative seeks to increase the current (insert name of tax) rate by (insert the tax percentage difference) percent, resulting in a(n) (insert the tax percentage increase) percent increase in the current tax rate."; (D)if the proposed law will be funded, in whole or in part, from new revenues, a description of the amount and source of the new revenues; and(E)if the proposed law will be funded, in whole or in part, from existing revenues, a description of the existing line items or programs that will receive less funding in order to fund the proposed law and the amount by which the funding will be reduced;(iii)a statement indicating whether persons gathering signatures for the initiative petition may be paid for gathering signatures; and(iv)the text of the proposed law.(3)(a)An individual's status as a resident, under Subsection (2), is determined in accordance with Section 20A-2-105.(b)The initiative application and the initiative application's contents are public when filed with the lieutenant governor.(c)If the fiscal impact of the law proposed by an initiative is less than the amount specified by joint legislative rule for designating a bill as a fiscal note bill:(i)the initiative application is not required to include the description described in Subsection (2)(e)(ii)(2)(f)(ii); and(ii)the lieutenant governor may not reject the initiative application or initiative application addendum under Subsection (5)(c).(4)If the initiative petition fails to qualify for the ballot of the election described in Subsection 20A-7-201(2)(b), the sponsors shall:(a)submit a new initiative application;(b)obtain new signature sheets; and(c)collect signatures again.(5)The lieutenant governor shall reject an initiative application or an initiative application addendum filed under Subsection 20A-7-204.1(5) and not issue signature sheets if:(a)the proposed law:(i)is unconstitutional;(ii)is nonsensical;(iii)could not become law if passed;(iv)contains more than one subject as evaluated in accordance with Subsection (6); or(v)is identical or substantially similar to a law proposed by an initiative for which signatures were submitted to the county clerks and lieutenant governor for certification within two years preceding the date on which the initiative application for the new initiative is filed;(b)the subject of the proposed law is not clearly expressed in the law's title; or(c)except as provided in Subsection (3)(c), the lieutenant governor determines, after consultation with the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst, that the funding description, described in Subsection (2)(e)(ii)(2)(f)(ii):(i)does not comply with the requirements of Subsection (2)(e)(ii)(2)(f)(ii); or(ii)is unlikely to provide adequate funding for the proposed law.(6)To evaluate whether the proposed law contains more than one subject under Subsection (5)(a)(iv), the lieutenant governor shall apply the same standard provided in Utah Constitution, Article VI, Section 22, which prohibits a bill from passing that contains more than one subject.

Section 12:
Section 12. Section 20A-7-202.5 is amended to read:20A-7-202.5Effective 05/06/26. Initial fiscal impact statement -- Preparation of statement -- Challenge to statement.(1)Within three business days after the day on which the lieutenant governor receives an initiative application, the lieutenant governor shall submit a copy of the initiative application to the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst.(2)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall prepare an unbiased, good faith initial fiscal impact statement for the proposed law, not exceeding 100 words plus 100 words per revenue source created or impacted by the proposed law, that contains:(i)a description of the total estimated fiscal impact of the proposed law over the time period or time periods determined by the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst to be most useful in understanding the estimated fiscal impact of the proposed law;(ii)if the proposed law would increase taxes, decrease taxes, or impose a new tax, a dollar amount representing the total estimated increase or decrease for each type of tax affected under the proposed law, a dollar amount showing the estimated amount of a new tax, and a dollar amount representing the total estimated increase or decrease in taxes under the proposed law;(iii)if the proposed law would increase a particular tax or tax rate, the tax percentage difference and the tax percentage increase for each tax or tax rate increased;(iv)if the proposed law will be funded, in whole or in part, from new revenues, a description of the amount and source of the new revenues;(v)if the proposed law will be funded, in whole or in part, from existing revenues, a description of:(A)the existing line items or programs that will receive less funding in order to fund the proposed law and the amount by which the funding will be reduced; and(B)the likely impact of the reduction in funding described in Subsection (2)(a)(v)(A);(vi)if the proposed law would result in the issuance or a change in the status of bonds,  notes, or other debt instruments, a dollar amount representing the total estimated increase or decrease in public debt under the proposed law;(vii)a dollar amount representing the estimated cost or savings, if any, to state or local government entities under the proposed law;(viii)if the proposed law would increase costs to state government, a listing of all sources of funding for the estimated costs; and(ix)a concise description and analysis titled "Funding Source," not to exceed 100 words for each funding source, of the funding source information described in Subsection 20A-7-202(2)(e)(ii)20A-7-202(2)(f)(ii).(b)If the proposed law is estimated to have fiscal impact of less than the amount specified by joint legislative rule for designating a bill as a fiscal note bill, the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall prepare the initial fiscal impact statement to read substantially as follows:"The Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst estimates that the law proposed by this initiative would have no significant fiscal impact and would not result in either an increase or decrease in taxes or debt."(3)Within 25 calendar days after the day on which the lieutenant governor delivers a copy of the initiative application, the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall:(a)send a copy of the initial fiscal impact statement to the lieutenant governor's office; and(b)send a copy of the initial fiscal impact statement to the first five sponsors named in the initiative application.(4)(a)(i)Three or more of the sponsors of the initiative petition may, within 20 calendar days after the day on which the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst delivers the initial fiscal impact statement to the lieutenant governor's office, file a petition with the appropriate court, alleging that the initial fiscal impact statement, taken as a whole, is an inaccurate estimate of the fiscal impact of the initiative.(ii)After receipt of the appeal, the court shall direct the lieutenant governor to send notice of the petition filed with the court to:(A)any person or group that has filed an argument with the lieutenant governor's office for or against the initiative that is the subject of the challenge; and(B)any political issues committee established under Section 20A-11-801 that has filed written or electronic notice with the lieutenant governor that identifies the name, mailing or email address, and telephone number of the person designated to receive notice about any issues relating to the initiative.(b)(i)There is a presumption that the initial fiscal impact statement prepared by the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst is based upon reasonable assumptions, uses reasonable data, and applies accepted analytical methods to present the estimated fiscal impact of the initiative.(ii)The court may not revise the contents of, or direct the revision of, the initial fiscal impact statement unless the plaintiffs rebut the presumption by clear and convincing evidence that establishes that the initial fiscal impact statement, taken as a whole, is an inaccurate statement of the estimated fiscal impact of the initiative.(iii)The court may refer an issue related to the initial fiscal impact statement to a master to examine the issue and make a report in accordance with Utah Rules of Civil Procedure, Rule 53.(c)The court shall certify to the lieutenant governor a fiscal impact statement for the initiative that meets the requirements of this section.

Section 13:
Section 13. Section 20A-7-202.7 is amended to read:20A-7-202.7Effective 05/06/26. Posting initiative information.(1)Within one business day after the day on which the lieutenant governor receives the initial fiscal impact statement under Subsection 20A-7-202.5(3)(a), the lieutenant governor shall post the following information together in a conspicuous place on the lieutenant governor's website:(a)the initiative application;(b)the initiative petition;(c)the text of the proposed law;(d)the initial fiscal impact statement; and(e)information describing how an individual may remove the individual's signature from the initiative petition.(2)The lieutenant governor shall:(a)promptly update the information described in Subsection (1) if the information changes;, including if the text of the proposed law is modified under Subsection 20A-7-204.1(5); and(b)maintain the information described in Subsection (1) on the lieutenant governor's website until the initiative fails to qualify for the ballot or is passed or defeated at an election.

Section 14:
Section 14. Section 20A-7-203 is amended to read:20A-7-203Effective 05/06/26. Manual initiative process -- Form of initiative petition and signature sheets.(1)This section applies only to the manual initiative process.(2)(a)Each proposed initiative petition shall be printed in substantially the following form:"INITIATIVE PETITION To the Honorable ____, Lieutenant Governor:We, the undersigned citizens of Utah, respectfully demand that the following proposed law described in this initiative petition be submitted to the legal voters/Legislature of Utah for their/its approval or rejection at the regular general election/session to be held/ beginning on _________(month\day\year);Each signer says:I have personally signed this initiative petition or, if I am an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this initiative petition by directing the signature gatherer to enter the initials "AV" as my signature;The date next to my signature correctly reflects the date that I actually signed the initiative petition;I have personally had an opportunity to read the entire statement included with this initiative packet;I am registered to vote in Utah; andMy residence and post office address are written correctly after my name.NOTICE TO SIGNERS:Public hearings to discuss this initiative were held at: (list dates and locations of public hearings.).".(b)If the initiative proposes a tax increase, the The following statement shall appear, in at least 14-point, bold type, immediately following the information described in Subsection (2)(a):, if the initiative proposes a tax increase:"This initiative seeks to increase the current (insert name of tax) rate by (insert the tax percentage difference) percent, resulting in a(n) (insert the tax percentage increase) percent increase in the current tax rate.".(c)The following statement shall appear, in at least 14-point, bold type, immediately following the information described in Subsection (2)(a), if:(i)the initiative proposes a law other than a tax increase; and(ii)the initiative petition is part of a condensed initiative packet:"This initiative seeks to (the sponsors shall provide a brief, plain-language description of the principal provisions of the proposed law, not to exceed 50 words, that is understandable to the average reader).".(c)The sponsors of an initiative or an agent of the sponsors shall attach a copy of the proposed law to each initiative petition.(3)Each initiative signature sheet shall:(a)be printed on sheets of paper 8-1/2 inches long and 11 inches wide;(b)be ruled with a horizontal line three-fourths.75 inch from the top, with the space above that line blank for the purpose of binding;(c)include the title of the initiative printed below the horizontal line, in at least 14-point, bold type;(d)if the signature sheet is part of a condensed initiative packet:(i)contain a printed QR code at the top of the signature sheet, in a location above the columns described in Subsection (3)(e);(ii)ensure that the QR code links directly to the web page on the lieutenant governor's website described in Section 20A-7-202.7; and(iii)include the following statement adjacent to the QR code in not less than 8-point, bold type: "This QR code provides access to a website that includes the full text of the law proposed by this initiative petition.";(e)be vertically divided into columns immediately below the title of the initiative, as follows:(i)the first column shall begin .5 inch from the left side of the paper, be .25 inch wide, and be headed, together with the second column, "For Office Use Only";(ii)the second column shall be .25 inch wide;(iii)the third column shall be 2.5 inches wide, headed "Registered Voter's Printed Name (must be legible to be counted)";(iv)the fourth column shall be 2.5 inches wide, headed "Signature of Registered Voter";(v)the fifth column shall be .75 inch wide, headed "Date Signed";(vi)the sixth column shall be three inches wide, headed "Street Address, City, Zip Code"; and(vii)the seventh column shall be .75 inch wide, headed "Birth Date or Age (Optional)"; and(f)be horizontally divided into rows as follows:(i)the first row shall be .5 inch high for purposes of a registered voter's entry of the information described in Subsection (3)(e); and(ii)the second row shall span the width of each column described in Subsection (3)(e) and contain the following statement in 12-point type: "By signing this initiative petition, you are stating that you had an opportunity to read and understand the law proposed by this initiative petition.".(d)include a table immediately below the title of the initiative, and beginning .5 inch from the left side of the paper, as follows:(i)the first column shall be .5 inch wide and include three rows;(ii)the first row of the first column shall be .85 inch tall and contain the words "For Office Use Only" in 10-point type;(iii)the second row of the first column shall be .35 inch tall;(iv)the third row of the first column shall be .5 inch tall;(v)the second column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(vi)the first row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Registered Voter's Printed Name (must be legible to be counted)" in 10-point type;(vii)the second row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(viii)the third row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Street Address, City, Zip Code" in 10-point type;(ix)the fourth row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(x)the third column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(xi)the first row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Signature of Registered Voter" in 10-point type;(xii)the second row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xiii)the third row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Email Address (optional, to receive additional information)" in 10-point type;(xiv)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xv)the fourth column shall be one inch wide;(xvi)the first row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Date Signed" in 10-point type;(xvii)the second row of the fourth column shall be .5 inch tall;(xviii)the third row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Birth Date or Age (optional)" in 10-point type;(xix)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall; and(xx)the fifth row of the entire table shall be the width of the entire table, .4 inch tall, and contain the following statement, "By signing this initiative petition, you are stating that you have read and understand the law proposed by this initiative petition." in 12-point type;(e)(4)the table described in Subsection (3)(d)The columns and rows described in Subsections (3)(e) and (f) shall be repeated, leaving sufficient room at the bottom of the sheet for the information described in Subsection (3)(f); andSubsection (5).(f)(5)at the bottom of the sheet, includeThe bottom of the signature sheet shall include, in the following order:(i)(a)the words "Fiscal Impact of" followed by the title of the initiative, in at least 12-point, bold type;(ii)(b)except as provided in Subsection (5)(6), the initial fiscal impact statement issued by the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-202.5(2)(a), including any update in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-204.1(5), in not less than 12-point type;(iii)(c)if the initiative proposes a tax increase, the following statement in 12-point, bold type:"This initiative seeks to increase the current (insert name of tax) rate by (insert the tax percentage difference) percent, resulting in a(n) (insert the tax percentage increase) percent increase in the current tax rate."; and(d)if the signature sheet is part of a condensed initiative packet, the following statement in 12-point, bold type:"This initiative seeks to (the sponsors shall provide a brief, plain-language description of the principal provisions of the proposed law, not to exceed 50 words, that is understandable to the average reader)."; and(iv)(e)the word "Warning," in 12-point, bold type, followed by the following statement in not less than eight-point type:"It is a class A misdemeanor for an individual to sign an initiative petition with a name other than the individual's own name, or to knowingly sign the individual's name more than once for the same initiative petition, or to sign an initiative petition when the individual knows that the individual is not a registered voterto sign an initiative petition using a name other than your own name, to sign more than once, or to sign if you are not a registered voter.Birth date or age information is not required, but it may be used to verify your identity with voter registration records.  If you choose not to provide it, your signature may not be verified as a valid signature if you change your address before petition signatures are verified or if the information you provide does not match your voter registration recordsProviding your birth date or age is optional, but it may be used to verify your identity. If you do not provide it, your signature may not be validated if your address changes or if the information you provide does not match your voter registration record."(4)The final page of each initiative packet shall contain the following printed or typed statement:Verification of signature collectorState of Utah, County of ____I, _______________, of ____, hereby state, under penalty of perjury, that:I am at least 18 years old;All the names that appear in this initiative packet were signed by individuals who professed to be the individuals whose names appear in it, and each of the individuals signed the individual's name on it in my presence or, in the case of an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this initiative petition on the individual's behalf, at the direction of the individual and in the individual's presence, by entering the initials "AV" as the individual's signature;        I certify that, for each individual whose signature is represented in this initiative packet by the initials "AV":              I obtained the individual's voluntary direction or consent to sign the initiative petition on the individual's behalf;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual lacked the mental capacity to give direction or consent;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual did not understand the purpose or nature of my signing the initiative petition on the individual's behalf;              I did not intentionally or knowingly deceive the individual into directing me to, or consenting for me to, sign the initiative petition on the individual's behalf; and              I did not intentionally or knowingly enter false information on the signature sheet;I did not knowingly make a misrepresentation of fact concerning the law proposed by the initiative;I believe that each individual's name, post office address, and residence is written correctly, that each signer has read the law proposed by the initiative, and that each signer is registered to vote in Utah;The correct date of signature appears next to each individual's name; andI have not paid or given anything of value to any individual who signed this initiative packet to encourage that individual to sign it.______________________________________________________________________(Name)                 (Residence Address)                                         (Date)(5)(6)The final page of each initiative packet shall contain the circulator verification sheet described in Subsection 20A-1-1004(1).(7)If the initial fiscal impact statement described in Subsection (3)(f)(ii)(5)(b), as updated in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-204.1(5), exceeds 200 words, the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall prepare a shorter summary statement, for the purpose of inclusion on an initiative signature sheet, that does not exceed 200 words.(6)(8)If the forms described in this section are substantially followed, the initiative petitions are sufficient, notwithstanding clerical and merely technical errors.

Section 15:
Section 15. Section 20A-7-204 is amended to read:20A-7-204Effective 05/06/26. Manual initiative process -- Circulation requirements -- Lieutenant governor to provide sponsors with materials.(1)This section applies only to the manual initiative process.(2)(a)In order to obtain the necessary number of signatures required by this part, the sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall, after the sponsors receive the documents described in Subsection (3), circulate initiative packets that meet the form requirements of this part.(b)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors may circulate initiative packets using traditional initiative packets, condensed initiative packets, or both.(3)The lieutenant governor shall provide the sponsors with a copy of the initiative petition and a signature sheet no later than the first business day that is at least three calendar days after the day on which the following conditions are fulfilled:(a)the sponsors hold the final hearing required under Section 20A-7-204.1;(b)the sponsors provide to the Office of the Lieutenant Governor the video tape, audio tape, or comprehensive minutes described in Subsection 20A-7-204.1(4) for each public hearing described in Section 20A-7-204.1;(c)(i)the sponsors give written notice to the Office of the Lieutenant Governor that the sponsors waive the opportunity to change the text of the proposed law under Subsection 20A-7-204.1(5);(ii)the deadline, described in Subsection 20A-7-204.1(5)(a), for changing the text of the proposed law passes without the sponsors filing an application addendum in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-204.1(5); or(iii)if the sponsors file an application addendum in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-204.1(5), the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst provides to the Office of the Lieutenant Governor:(A)an updated initial fiscal impact statement, in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-204.1(5)(b); or(B)a written notice indicating that no changes to the initial fiscal impact statement are necessary;(d)(i)the sponsors give written notice to the Office of the Lieutenant Governor that the sponsors waive the opportunity to:(A)challenge the initial fiscal impact statement in court; and(B)if applicable, challenge the updated initial fiscal impact statement in court;(ii)the deadline, described in Subsection 20A-7-202.5(4)(a)(i), for:(A)challenging the initial fiscal impact statement in court passes without the sponsors filing a petition to challenge; and(B)if applicable, challenging the updated initial fiscal impact statement in court passes without the sponsors filing a petition to challenge; or(iii)if the sponsors timely file a petition challenging the initial fiscal impact statement in court or, if applicable, the updated initial fiscal impact statement in court, and the court's decision becomes final; and(e)the sponsors sign an agreement, under Subsection (6)(a), with the Office of the Lieutenant Governor specifying the range of numbers that the sponsors will use to number the initiative packetsthe agreement described in Subsection (6)(a)(iii) with the Office of the Lieutenant Governor.(4)The sponsors of the initiative shall:(a)arrange and pay for the printing of all documents that are part of the initiative packets; and(b)ensure that the initiative packets and the documents described in Subsection (4)(a) meet the requirements of this part.(5)(a)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors may prepare the initiative packets for circulation by creating multiple initiative packets.(b)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall create the initiative packets by binding a copy of the initiative petition with the text of the proposed law, including any modification made under Subsection 20A-7-204.1(5) and no more than 50 signature sheets together at the top in a manner that the initiative packets may be conveniently opened for signingThe sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall create initiative packets by:(i)binding the components of each initiative packet together at the top in a manner that secures all components of the initiative packet together;(ii)arranging the components in the following order:(A)a copy of the initiative petition;(B)if the initiative packet is a traditional initiative packet, a copy of the law proposed by the initiative petition, including any modification to the law made under Subsection 20A-7-204.1(5);(C)the signature sheets; and(D)the circulator verification sheet described in Subsection 20A-1-1004(1);(iii)including no more than 50 signature sheets in each initiative packet; and(iv)binding the initiative packet in a manner that allows the initiative packet to be conveniently opened for signing.(c)An initiative packet is not required to have a uniform number of signature sheets.(6)(a)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall, before gathering signatures:(i)ensure that the sponsors or any agent of the sponsors who gathers signatures have completed the online training course described in Section 20A-1-1005;(ii)contact the lieutenant governor's office to receive a range of numbers that the sponsors may use to number initiative packets;(ii)(iii)sign an agreement with the Office of the Lieutenant Governor, specifying: (A)whether the sponsors or an agent of the sponsors will circulate initiative packets using traditional initiative packets, condensed initiative packets, or both; and(B)the range of numbers that the sponsors will use to number the initiative packets; and(iii)(iv)number each initiative packet, sequentially, within the range of numbers provided by the lieutenant governor's office, starting with the lowest number in the range.(b)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors may not:(i)number an initiative packet in a manner not directed by the lieutenant governor's office; or(ii)circulate or submit an initiative packet that is not numbered in the manner directed by the lieutenant governor's office.

Section 16:
Section 16. Section 20A-7-213 is amended to read:20A-7-213Effective 05/06/26. Misconduct of electors and officers -- Penalty.(1)It is unlawful for an individual to:(a)sign any name other than the individual's own to an initiative petition or a statement described in Subsection 20A-7-105(8)20A-7-105(9) or 20A-7-216(4);(b)knowingly sign the individual's name more than once for the same initiative at one election;(c)knowingly indicate that an individual who signed an initiative petition signed the initiative petition on a date other than the date that the individual signed the initiative petition;(d)sign an initiative petition knowing the individual is not a legal voter;(e)on behalf of a voter described in Section 20A-7-106, place the initials "AV" or enter any information on a signature sheet or statement described in Section 20A-7-106, if the individual:(i)does not obtain the voluntary direction or consent of the voter;(ii)believes or has reason to believe that the voter lacks the mental capacity to give the voter's direction or consent;(iii)believes or has reason to believe that the voter does not understand the purpose or nature of the action taken by the individual on behalf of the voter;(iv)intentionally or knowingly deceives the voter into providing the direction or consent of the voter; or(v)intentionally or knowingly enters false information on the signature sheet or statement; or(f)knowingly and willfully violate any provision of this part.(2)It is unlawful for an individual to sign the verification for an initiative packet, or to electronically sign the verification for a signature under Subsection 20A-21-201(10), knowing that:(a)the signature date associated with the individual's signature for the initiative petition is not the date that the individual signed the initiative petition;(b)the individual has not witnessed the signatures of those individuals whose signatures the individual collects or submits; or(c)one or more individuals who signed the initiative petition are not registered to vote in Utah.(3)It is unlawful for an individual to:(a)pay an individual to sign an initiative petition;(b)pay an individual to remove the individual's signature from an initiative petition;(c)accept payment to sign an initiative petition; or(d)accept payment to have the individual's name removed from an initiative petition.(4)A violation of this section is a class A misdemeanor.

Section 17:
Section 17. Section 20A-7-215 is amended to read:20A-7-215Effective 05/06/26. Electronic initiative process -- Form of initiative petition -- Circulation requirements -- Signature collection.(1)This section applies only to the electronic initiative process.(2)(a)The first screen presented on the approved device shall include the following statement:"This INITIATIVE PETITION is addressed to the Honorable ____, Lieutenant Governor:The citizens of Utah who sign this petition respectfully demand that the following proposed law be submitted to the legal voters/Legislature of Utah for their/its approval or rejection at the regular general election/session to be held/beginning on _________(month\day\year)."(b)An individual may not advance to the second screen until the individual clicks a link at the bottom of the first screen stating, "By clicking here, I attest that I have read and understand the information presented on this screen."(3)(a)The second screen presented on the approved device shall include the following statement:"Public hearings to discuss this initiative were held at: (list dates and locations of public hearings.)".(b)An individual may not advance to the third screen until the individual clicks a link at the bottom of the second screen stating, "By clicking here, I attest that I have read and understand the information presented on this screen."(4)(a)The third screen presented on the approved device shall include the title of proposed law, described in Subsection 20A-7-202(2)(e)(i)20A-7-202(2)(f)(i), followed by the entire text of the proposed law.(b)An individual may not advance to the fourth screen until the individual clicks a link at the bottom of the third screen stating, "By clicking here, I attest that I have read and understand the entire text of the proposed law."(5)Subsequent screens shall be presented on the device in the following order, with the individual viewing the device being required, before advancing to the next screen, to click a link at the bottom of the screen with the following statement: "By clicking here, I attest that I have read and understand the information presented on this screen.":(a)a description of all proposed sources of funding for the costs associated with the proposed law, including the proposed percentage of total funding from each source;(b)(i)if the initiative proposes a tax increase, the following statement, "This initiative seeks to increase the current (insert name of tax) rate by (insert the tax percentage difference) percent, resulting in a(n) (insert the tax percentage increase) percent increase in the current tax rate."; or(ii)if the initiative does not propose a tax increase, the following statement, "This initiative does not propose a tax increase.";(c)the initial fiscal impact statement issued by the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-202.5(2)(a), including any update in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-204.1(5)(b);(d)a statement indicating whether persons gathering signatures for the initiative petition may be paid for gathering signatures; and(e)the following statement, followed by links where the individual may click "yes" or "no":"I have personally read the entirety of each statement presented on this device;I am personally signing this initiative petition;I am registered to vote in Utah; andAll information I enter on this device, including my residence and post office address, is accurate.It is a class A misdemeanor for an individual to sign an initiative petition with a name other than the individual's own name, or to knowingly sign the individual's name more than once for the same initiative petition, or to sign an initiative petition when the individual knows that the individual is not a registered voter.WARNINGEven if your voter registration record is classified as private, your name, voter identification number, and date of signature in relation to signing this initiative petition will be made public.Do you wish to continue and sign this initiative petition?"(6)(a)If the individual clicks "no" in response to the question described in Subsection (5)(e), the next screen shall include the following statement, "Thank you for your time. Please return this device to the signature-gatherer."(b)If the individual clicks "yes" in response to the question described in Subsection (5)(e), the website, or the application that accesses the website, shall take the signature-gatherer and the individual signing the initiative petition through the signature process described in Section 20A-21-201.

Section 18:
Section 18. Section 20A-7-302 is amended to read:20A-7-302Effective 05/06/26. Referendum process -- Application procedures.(1)Individuals wishing to circulate a referendum petition shall file a referendum application with the lieutenant governor no later than 5 p.m. on the first business day that is at least five calendar days after the day on which the legislative session at which the law passed ends.(2)The referendum application shall include:(a)the name and residence address of at least five sponsors of the referendum petition;(b)a statement designating a sponsor liaison, including the sponsor liaison's name, residence address, telephone number, and email address;(b)(c)a statement indicating that each of the sponsors is registered to vote in Utah;(c)(d)a statement indicating whether persons gathering signatures for the referendum petition may be paid for gathering signatures;(d)(e)the signature of each of the sponsors, attested to by a notary public; and(e)(f)a copy of the law that is the subject of the proposed referendum.

Section 19:
Section 19. Section 20A-7-303 is amended to read:20A-7-303Effective 05/06/26. Manual referendum process -- Form of referendum petition and signature sheets.(1)This section applies only to the manual referendum process.(2)(a)Each proposed referendum petition shall be printed in substantially the following form:"REFERENDUM PETITION To the Honorable ____, Lieutenant Governor:We, the undersigned citizens of Utah, respectfully order that Senate (or House)(insert "Senate" or "House") Bill No.  ____, entitled (title of act, and, if the petition is against less than the whole act, set forth here the part or parts on which the referendum is sought), passed by the Legislature of the state of Utah during the ____ Session, be referred to the people of Utah for their approval or rejection at a regular general election or a statewide special election;Each signer says:I have personally signed this referendum petition or, if I am an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this referendum petition by directing the signature gatherer to enter the initials "AV" as my signature;The date next to my signature correctly reflects the date that I actually signed the referendum petition;I have personally had an opportunity to read the entire statement included with this referendum packet;I am registered to vote in Utah; andMy residence and post office address are written correctly after my name.".(b)The sponsors of a referendum or an agent of the sponsors shall attach a copy of the law that is the subject of the referendum to each referendum petition.(3)Each referendum signature sheet shall:(a)be printed on sheets of paper 8-1/2 inches long and 11 inches wide;(b)be ruled with a horizontal line three-fourths.75 inch from the top, with the space above that line blank for the purpose of binding;(c)include the title of the referendum printed below the horizontal line, in at least 14-point, bold type;(d)if the signature sheet is part of a condensed referendum packet:(i)contain a printed QR code at the top of the signature sheet, in a location above the columns described in Subsection (3)(e);(ii)ensure that the QR code links directly to the web page on the lieutenant governor's website described in Section 20A-7-304.5; and(iii)include the following statement adjacent to the QR code in not less than 8-point, bold type: "This QR code provides access to a website that includes the full text of the law that is the subject of this referendum petition.";(e)be vertically divided into columns immediately below the title of the referendum, as follows:(i)the first column shall begin .5 inch from the left side of the paper, be .25 inch wide, and be headed, together with the second column, "For Office Use Only";(ii)the second column shall be .25 inch wide;(iii)the third column shall be 2.5 inches wide, headed "Registered Voter's Printed Name (must be legible to be counted)";(iv)the fourth column shall be 2.5 inches wide, headed "Signature of Registered Voter";(v)the fifth column shall be .75 inch wide, headed "Date Signed";(vi)the sixth column shall be three inches wide, headed "Street Address, City, Zip Code"; and(vii)the seventh column shall be .75 inch wide, headed "Birth Date or Age (Optional)"; and(f)be horizontally divided into rows as follows:(i)the first row shall be .5 inch high for purposes of a registered voter's entry of the information described in Subsection (3)(e); and(ii)the second row shall span the width of each column described in Subsection (3)(e) and contain the following statement in 11-point type: "By signing this referendum petition, you are stating that you had an opportunity to read and understand the law that this referendum petition seeks to overturn.".(d)include a table immediately below the title of the referendum, and beginning .5 inch from the left side of the paper, as follows:(i)the first column shall be .5 inch wide and include three rows;(ii)the first row of the first column shall be .85 inch tall and contain the words "For Office Use Only" in 10-point type;(iii)the second row of the first column shall be .35 inch tall;(iv)the third row of the first column shall be .5 inch tall;(v)the second column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(vi)the first row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Registered Voter's Printed Name (must be legible to be counted)" in 10-point type;(vii)the second row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(viii)the third row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Street Address, City, Zip Code" in 10-point type;(ix)the fourth row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(x)the third column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(xi)the first row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Signature of Registered Voter" in 10-point type;(xii)the second row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xiii)the third row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Email Address (optional, to receive additional information)" in 10-point type;(xiv)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xv)the fourth column shall be one inch wide;(xvi)the first row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Date Signed" in 10-point type;(xvii)the second row of the fourth column shall be .5 inch tall;(xviii)the third row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Birth Date or Age (optional)" in 10-point type;(xix)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall; and(xx)the fifth row of the entire table shall be the width of the entire table, .4 inch tall, and contain the following words "By signing this referendum petition, you are stating that you have read and understand the law that this referendum petition seeks to overturn." in 12-point type;(e)(4)the table described in Subsection (3)(d)The columns and rows described in Subsections (3)(e) and (f) shall be repeated, leaving sufficient room at the bottom of the sheet for the information described in Subsection (3)(f); andSubsection (5).(f)(5)at the bottom of the sheet, includeThe bottom of the signature sheet shall include, in the following order: (a)the following statement in at least 12-point, bold type: "This referendum petition seeks to have (insert "Senate" or "House") Bill No.  ____, entitled (title of act, and, if the petition is against less than the whole act, set forth here the part or parts on which the referendum is sought), passed by the Legislature of the state of Utah during the ____ Session, be referred to the people of Utah for their approval or rejection at a regular general election or a statewide special election."; and(b)the word "Warning," in 12-point, bold type, followed by the following statement in not less than eight-point type:"It is a class A misdemeanor for an individual to sign a referendum petition with a name other than the individual's own name, or to knowingly sign the individual's name more than once for the same referendum petition, or to sign a referendum petition when the individual knows that the individual is not a registered voterto sign a referendum petition using a name other than your own name, to sign more than once, or to sign if you are not a registered voter.Birth date or age information is not required, but it may be used to verify your identity with voter registration records. If you choose not to provide it, your signature may not be verified as a valid signature if you change your address before petition signatures are verified or if the information you provide does not match your voter registration recordsProviding your birth date or age is optional, but it may be used to verify your identity. If you do not provide it, your signature may not be validated if your address changes or if the information you provide does not match your voter registration record."(4)The final page of each referendum packet shall contain the following printed or typed statement:Verification of signature collectorState of Utah, County of ____I, _______________, of ____, hereby state, under penalty of perjury, that:I am at least 18 years old;All the names that appear in this referendum packet were signed by individuals who professed to be the individuals whose names appear in it, and each of the individuals signed the individual's name on it in my presence or, in the case of an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this referendum petition on the individual's behalf, at the direction of the individual and in the individual's presence, by entering the initials "AV" as the individual's signature;        I certify that, for each individual whose signature is represented in this referendum packet by the initials "AV":              I obtained the individual's voluntary direction or consent to sign the referendum petition on the individual's behalf;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual lacked the mental capacity to give direction or consent;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual did not understand the purpose or nature of my signing the referendum petition on the individual's behalf;              I did not intentionally or knowingly deceive the individual into directing me to, or consenting for me to, sign the referendum petition on the individual's behalf; and              I did not intentionally or knowingly enter false information on the signature sheet;I did not knowingly make a misrepresentation of fact concerning the law this petition seeks to overturn;I believe that each individual's name, post office address, and residence is written correctly, that each signer has read the law that the referendum seeks to overturn, and that each signer is registered to vote in Utah;The correct date of signature appears next to each individual's name; andI have not paid or given anything of value to any individual who signed this referendum packet to encourage that individual to sign it.________________________________________________________________________(Name)                       (Residence Address)                                  (Date).(5)(6)The final page of each referendum packet shall contain the circulator verification sheet described in Subsection 20A-1-1004(1).(7)If the forms described in this section are substantially followed, the referendum petitions are sufficient, notwithstanding clerical and merely technical errors.

Section 20:
Section 20. Section 20A-7-304 is amended to read:20A-7-304Effective 05/06/26. Manual referendum process -- Circulation requirements -- Lieutenant governor to provide sponsors with materials.(1)This section applies only to the manual referendum process.(2)(a)In order to obtain the necessary number of signatures required by this part, the sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall, after the sponsors receive the documents described in Subsection (3), circulate referendum packets that meet the form requirements of this part.(b)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors may circulate referendum packets using traditional referendum packets, condensed referendum packets, or both.(3)The lieutenant governor shall provide the sponsors with a copy of the referendum petition and a signature sheet no later than the first business day that is at least five calendar days after the day on which the sponsors sign an agreement, under Subsection (6)(a), with the Office of the Lieutenant Governor specifying the range of numbers that the sponsors will use to number the referendum packets.(4)The sponsors of the referendum petition shall:(a)arrange and pay for the printing of all documents that are part of the referendum packets; and(b)ensure that the referendum packets and the documents described in Subsection (4)(a) meet the form requirements of this section.(5)(a)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors may prepare the referendum packets for circulation by creating multiple referendum packets.(b)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall create referendum packets by binding a copy of the referendum petition with the text of the law that is the subject of the referendum and no more than 50 signature sheets together at the top in a manner that the referendum packets may be conveniently opened for signingThe sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall create referendum packets by:(i)binding the components of each referendum packet together at the top in a manner that secures all components of the referendum packet together;(ii)arranging the components in the following order:(A)a copy of the referendum petition;(B)if the referendum packet is a traditional referendum packet, a copy of the law that is the subject of the referendum petition;(C)the signature sheets; and(D)the circulator verification sheet described in Subsection 20A-1-1004(1);(iii)including no more than 50 signature sheets in each referendum packet; and(iv)binding the referendum packet in a manner that allows the referendum packet to be conveniently opened for signing.(c)A referendum packet is not required to have a uniform number of signature sheets.(6)(a)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall, before gathering signatures:(i)ensure that the sponsors or any agent of the sponsors who gathers signatures have completed the online training course described in Section 20A-1-1005;(ii)contact the lieutenant governor's office to receive a range of numbers that the sponsors may use to number referendum packets;(ii)(iii)sign an agreement with the Office of the Lieutenant Governor, specifying: (A)whether the sponsors or an agent of the sponsors will circulate referendum packets using traditional referendum packets, condensed referendum packets, or both; and(B)the range of numbers that the sponsor will use to number the referendum packets; and(iii)(iv)number each referendum packet, sequentially, within the range of numbers provided by the lieutenant governor's office, starting with the lowest number in the range.(b)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors may not:(i)number a referendum packet in a manner not directed by the lieutenant governor's office; or(ii)circulate or submit a referendum packet that is not numbered in the manner directed by the lieutenant governor's office.

Section 21:
Section 21. Section 20A-7-502 is amended to read:20A-7-502Effective 05/06/26. Local initiative process -- Application procedures.(1)Individuals wishing to circulate an initiative petition shall file an initiative application with the local clerk.(2)The initiative application shall include:(a)the name and residence address of at least five sponsors of the initiative petition;(b)a statement indicating that each of the sponsors is registered to vote in Utah;(c)a statement designating a sponsor liaison, including the sponsor liaison's name, residence address, telephone number, and email address;(c)(d)the signature of each of the sponsors, acknowledged by a notary public;(d)(e)a copy of the proposed law that includes:(i)the title of the proposed law that clearly expresses the subject of the law;(ii)a description of all proposed sources of funding for the costs associated with the proposed law, including the proposed percentage of total funding from each source; and(iii)the text of the proposed law;(e)(f)if the initiative petition proposes a tax increase, the following statement, "This initiative seeks to increase the current (insert name of tax) rate by (insert the tax percentage difference) percent, resulting in a(n) (insert the tax percentage increase) percent increase in the current tax rate."; and(f)(g)a statement indicating whether persons gathering signatures for the initiative petition may be paid for gathering signatures.(3)A proposed law submitted under this section may not contain more than one subject to the same extent that a bill may not pass containing more than one subject as provided in Utah Constitution, Article VI, Section 22.

Section 22:
Section 22. Section 20A-7-503 is amended to read:20A-7-503Effective 05/06/26. Manual initiative process -- Form of initiative petition and signature sheet.(1)This section applies only to the manual initiative process.(2)(a)Each proposed initiative petition shall be printed in substantially the following form:"INITIATIVE PETITION To the Honorable ____, County Clerk/City Recorder/Town Clerk:We, the undersigned citizens of Utah, respectfully demand that the following proposed law described in this initiative petition be submitted to: the legislative body for its approval or rejection at its next meeting; and the legal voters of the county/city/town, if the legislative body rejects the proposed law or takes no action on it.Each signer says:I have personally signed this initiative petition or, if I am an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this initiative petition by directing the signature gatherer to enter the initials "AV" as my signature;The date next to my signature correctly reflects the date that I actually signed the petition;I have personally had an opportunity to read the entire statement included with this initiative packet;I am registered to vote in Utah; andMy residence and post office address are written correctly after my name."(b)If the initiative proposes a tax increase, theThe following statement shall appear, in at least 14-point, bold type, immediately following the information described in Subsection (2)(a):, if the initiative petition proposes a tax increase:"This initiative seeks to increase the current (insert name of tax) rate by (insert the tax percentage difference) percent, resulting in a(n) (insert the tax percentage increase) percent increase in the current tax rate.".(c)The following statement shall appear, in at least 14-point, bold type, immediately following the information described in Subsection (2)(a), if:(i)the initiative proposes a law other than a tax increase; and(ii)the initiative petition is part of a condensed initiative packet."This initiative seeks to (the sponsors shall provide a brief, plain-language description of the principal provisions of the proposed law, not to exceed 50 words, that is understandable to the average reader).".(c)The sponsors of an initiative or an agent of the sponsors shall attach a copy of the proposed law to each initiative petition.(3)Each initiative signature sheet shall:(a)be printed on sheets of paper 8-1/2 inches long and 11 inches wide;(b)be ruled with a horizontal line three-fourths.75 inch from the top, with the space above that line blank for the purpose of binding;(c)include the title of the initiative printed below the horizontal line, in at least 14-point, bold type;(d)if the signature sheet is part of a condensed initiative packet:(i)contain a printed QR code at the top of the signature sheet, in a location above the columns described in Subsection (3)(e);(ii)ensure that the QR code links directly to the web page on the local clerk's website described in Section 20A-7-502.6; and(iii)include the following statement adjacent to the QR code in not less than 8-point, bold type: "This QR code provides access to a website that includes the full text of the law proposed by this initiative petition.";(e)be vertically divided into columns immediately below the title of the initiative, as follows:(i)the first column shall begin .5 inch from the left side of the paper, be .25 inch wide, and be headed, together with the second column, "For Office Use Only";(ii)the second column shall be .25 inch wide;(iii)the third column shall be 2.5 inches wide, headed "Registered Voter's Printed Name (must be legible to be counted)";(iv)the fourth column shall be 2.5 inches wide, headed "Signature of Registered Voter";(v)the fifth column shall be .75 inch wide, headed "Date Signed";(vi)the sixth column shall be three inches wide, headed "Street Address, City, Zip Code"; and(vii)the seventh column shall be .75 inch wide, headed "Birth Date or Age (Optional)"; and(f)be horizontally divided into rows as follows:(i)the first row shall be .5 inch high for purposes of a registered voter's entry of the information described in Subsection (3)(e); and(ii)the second row shall span the width of each column described in Subsection (3)(e) and contain the following statement in 12-point type: "By signing this initiative petition, you are stating that you had an opportunity to read and understand the law proposed by this initiative petition.".(d)include a table immediately below the title of the initiative, and beginning .5 inch from the left side of the paper, as follows:(i)the first column shall be .5 inch wide and include three rows;(ii)the first row of the first column shall be .85 inch tall and contain the words "For Office Use Only" in 10-point type;(iii)the second row of the first column shall be .35 inch tall;(iv)the third row of the first column shall be .5 inch tall;(v)the second column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(vi)the first row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Registered Voter's Printed Name (must be legible to be counted)" in 10-point type;(vii)the second row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(viii)the third row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Street Address, City, Zip Code" in 10-point type;(ix)the fourth row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(x)the third column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(xi)the first row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Signature of Registered Voter" in 10-point type;(xii)the second row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xiii)the third row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Email Address (optional, to receive additional information)" in 10-point type;(xiv)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xv)the fourth column shall be one inch wide;(xvi)the first row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Date Signed" in 10-point type;(xvii)the second row of the fourth column shall be .5 inch tall;(xviii)the third row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Birth Date or Age (optional)" in 10-point type;(xix)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall; and(xx)the fifth row of the entire table shall be the width of the entire table, .4 inch tall, and contain the following words "By signing this initiative petition, you are stating that you have read and understand the law proposed by this initiative petition." in 12-point type;(e)(4)the table described in Subsection (3)(d)The columns and rows described in Subsections (3)(e) and (f) shall be repeated, leaving sufficient room at the bottom of the sheet for the information described in Subsection (3)(f); and(5).(f)(5)at the bottom of the sheet, includeThe bottom of the signature sheet shall include, in the following order:(i)(a)the words "Fiscal and legal impact of" followed by the title of the initiative, in at least 12-point, bold type;(ii)(b)the summary statement in the initial fiscal impact and legal statement issued by the budget officer in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-502.5(2)(b) and the cost estimate for printing and distributing information related to the initiative petition in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-502.5(3), in not less than 12-point, bold type;(iii)(c)if the initiative proposes a tax increase, the following statement in 12-point, bold type:"This initiative seeks to increase the current (insert name of tax) rate by (insert the tax percentage difference) percent, resulting in a(n) (insert the tax percentage increase) percent increase in the current tax rate."; and(d)if the signature sheet is part of a condensed initiative packet, the following statement in 12-point, bold type:"This initiative seeks to (the sponsors shall provide a brief, plain-language description of the principal provisions of the proposed law, not to exceed 50 words, that is understandable to the average reader)."; and(iv)(e)the word "Warning," in 12-point, bold type, followed by the following statement in not less than eight-point type:"It is a class A misdemeanor for an individual to sign an initiative petition with a name other than the individual's own name, or to knowingly sign the individual's name more than once for the same initiative petition, or to sign an initiative petition when the individual knows that the individual is not a registered voterto sign an initiative petition using a name other than your own name, to sign more than once, or to sign if you are not a registered voter.Birth date or age information is not required, but it may be used to verify your identity with voter registration records.  If you choose not to provide it, your signature may not be verified as a valid signature if you change your address before petition signatures are verified or if the information you provide does not match your voter registration recordsProviding your birth date or age is optional, but it may be used to verify your identity. If you do not provide it, your signature may not be validated if your address changes or if the information you provide does not match your voter registration record."(4)The final page of each initiative packet shall contain the following printed or typed statement:"Verification of signature collectorState of Utah, County of ____I, _______________, of ____, hereby state, under penalty of perjury, that:I am at least 18 years old;All the names that appear in this packet were signed by individuals who professed to be the individuals whose names appear in it, and each of the individuals signed the individual's name on it in my presence or, in the case of an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this initiative petition on the individual's behalf, at the direction of the individual and in the individual's presence, by entering the initials "AV" as the individual's signature;        I certify that, for each individual whose signature is represented in this initiative packet by the initials "AV":              I obtained the individual's voluntary direction or consent to sign the initiative petition on the individual's behalf;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual lacked the mental capacity to give direction or consent;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual did not understand the purpose or nature of my signing the initiative petition on the individual's behalf;              I did not intentionally or knowingly deceive the individual into directing me to, or consenting for me to, sign the initiative petition on the individual's behalf; and              I did not intentionally or knowingly enter false information on the signature sheet;I did not knowingly make a misrepresentation of fact concerning the law proposed by the initiative; andI believe that each individual's name, post office address, and residence is written correctly, that each signer has read the law proposed by the initiative, and that each signer is registered to vote in Utah.______________________________________________________________________(Name) (Residence Address) (Date)The correct date of signature appears next to each individual's name.I have not paid or given anything of value to any individual who signed this petition to encourage that individual to sign it._____________________________________________________________________(Name) (Residence Address) (Date)".(5)(6)The final page of each initiative packet shall contain the circulator verification sheet described in Subsection 20A-1-1004(1).(7)If the forms described in this section are substantially followed, the initiative petitions are sufficient, notwithstanding clerical and merely technical errors.

Section 23:
Section 23. Section 20A-7-504 is amended to read:20A-7-504Effective 05/06/26. Manual initiative process -- Circulation requirements -- Local clerk to provide sponsors with materials.(1)This section applies only to the manual initiative process.(2)(a)In order to obtain the necessary number of signatures required by this part, the sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall, after the sponsors receive the documents described in Subsections (3) and 20A-7-401.5(4)(b), circulate initiative packets that meet the form requirements of this part.(b)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors may circulate initiative packets using traditional initiative packets, condensed initiative packets, or both.(3)Within five calendar days after the day on which a county, city, town, or court determines, in accordance with Section 20A-7-502.7, that a law proposed in an initiative petition is legally referable to voters, the local clerk shall provide to the sponsors:(a)a copy of the initiative petition;(b)a signature sheet; and(c)a copy of the proposition information pamphlet provided to the sponsors under Subsection 20A-7-401.5(4)(b).(4)The sponsors of the initiative shall:(a)arrange and pay for the printing of all documents that are part of the initiative packets; and(b)ensure that the initiative packets and the documents described in Subsection (4)(a) meet the requirements of this part.(5)(a)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors may prepare the initiative packets for circulation by creating multiple initiative packets.(b)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall create initiative packets by binding a copy of the initiative petition with the text of the proposed law and no more than 50 signature sheets together at the top in a manner that the initiative packets may be conveniently opened for signing.The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall create initiative packets by:(i)binding the components of each initiative packet together at the top in a manner that secures all components of the initiative packet together;(ii)arranging the components in the following order:(A)a copy of the initiative petition;(B)if the initiative packet is a traditional initiative packet, a copy of the law proposed by the initiative petition;(C)the signature sheets; and(D)the circulator verification sheet described in Subsection 20A-1-1004(1);(iii)including no more than 50 signature sheets in each initiative packet; and(iv)binding the initiative packet in a manner that allows the initiative packet to be conveniently opened for signing.(c)An initiative packet is not required to have a uniform number of signature sheets.(d)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall include, with each initiative packet, a copy of the proposition information pamphlet provided to the sponsors under Subsection 20A-7-401.5(4)(b).(6)(a)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall, before gathering signatures:(i)ensure that the sponsors or any agent of the sponsors who gathers signatures have completed the online training course described in Section 20A-1-1005;(ii)contact the county clerk to receive a range of numbers that the sponsors may use to number initiative packets; and(iii)sign an agreement with the local clerk, specifying:(A)whether the sponsors or an agent of the sponsors will circulate initiative packets using traditional initiative packets, condensed initiative packets, or both; and(B)the range of numbers that the sponsor will use to number the referendum packets; and(ii)(iv)number each initiative packet, sequentially, within the range of numbers provided by the county clerk, starting with the lowest number in the range.(b)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors may not:(i)number an initiative packet in a manner not directed by the county clerk; or(ii)circulate or submit an initiative packet that is not numbered in the manner directed by the county clerk.(c)The county clerk shall keep a record of the number range provided under Subsection (6)(a).

Section 24:
Section 24. Section 20A-7-514 is amended to read:20A-7-514Effective 05/06/26. Electronic initiative process -- Form of initiative petition -- Circulation requirements -- Signature collection.(1)This section applies only to the electronic initiative process.(2)(a)The first screen presented on the approved device shall include the following statement:"This INITIATIVE PETITION is addressed to the Honorable ____, County Clerk/City Recorder/Town Clerk:The citizens of Utah who sign this petition respectfully demand that the following proposed law be submitted to: the legislative body for its approval or rejection at its next meeting; and the legal voters of the county/city/town, if the legislative body rejects the proposed law or takes no action on it."(b)An individual may not advance to the second screen until the individual clicks a link at the bottom of the first screen stating, "By clicking here, I attest that I have read and understand the information presented on this screen."(3)(a)The second screen presented on the approved device shall include the title of proposed law, described in Subsection 20A-7-502(2)(d)(i)20A-7-502(2)(e)(i), followed by the entire text of the proposed law.(b)An individual may not advance to the third screen until the individual clicks a link at the bottom of the second screen stating, "By clicking here, I attest that I have read and understand the entire text of the proposed law."(4)Subsequent screens shall be presented on the device in the following order, with the individual viewing the device being required, before advancing to the next screen, to click a link at the bottom of the screen with the following statement, "By clicking here, I attest that I have read and understand the information presented on this screen.":(a)(i)if the initiative proposes a tax increase, the following statement, "This initiative seeks to increase the current (insert name of tax) rate by (insert the tax percentage difference) percent, resulting in a(n) (insert the tax percentage increase) percent increase in the current tax rate."; or(ii)if the initiative does not propose a tax increase, the following statement, "This initiative does not propose a tax increase.";(b)the summary statement from the initial fiscal impact and legal statement issued by the budget officer in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-502.5(2)(b) and the cost estimate for printing and distributing information related to the initiative petition in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-502.5(3);(c)a statement indicating whether persons gathering signatures for the initiative petition may be paid for gathering signatures; and(d)the following statement, followed by links where the individual may click "yes" or "no":"I have personally read the entirety of each statement presented on this device;I am personally signing this petition;I am registered to vote in Utah; andAll information I enter on this device, including my residence and post office address, is accurate.It is a class A misdemeanor for an individual to sign an initiative petition with a name other than the individual's own name, or to knowingly sign the individual's name more than once for the same initiative petition, or to sign an initiative petition when the individual knows that the individual is not a registered voter.WARNINGEven if your voter registration record is classified as private, your name, voter identification number, and date of signature in relation to signing this initiative petition will be made public.Do you wish to continue and sign this initiative petition?"(5)(a)If the individual clicks "no" in response to the question described in Subsection (4)(d), the next screen shall include the following statement, "Thank you for your time. Please return this device to the signature-gatherer."(b)If the individual clicks "yes" in response to the question described in Subsection (4)(d), the website, or the application that accesses the website, shall take the signature-gatherer and the individual signing the petition through the signature process described in Section 20A-21-201.

Section 25:
Section 25. Section 20A-7-602 is amended to read:20A-7-602Effective 05/06/26. Local referendum process -- Application procedures.(1)Individuals wishing to circulate a referendum petition shall file a referendum application with the local clerk.(2)The referendum application shall include:(a)the name and residence address of at least five sponsors of the referendum petition;(b)a statement indicating that each of the sponsors is registered to vote in Utah;(c)a statement designating a sponsor liaison, including the sponsor liaison's name, residence address, telephone number, and email address;(c)(d)a statement indicating whether persons gathering signatures for the referendum petition may be paid for gathering signatures;(d)(e)the signature of each of the sponsors, acknowledged by a notary public; and(e)(f)(i)if the referendum challenges an ordinance or resolution, a copy of the ordinance or resolution; or(ii)if the referendum challenges a local law that is not an ordinance or resolution, a written description of the local law, including the result of the vote on the local law.

Section 26:
Section 26. Section 20A-7-603 is amended to read:20A-7-603Effective 05/06/26. Manual referendum process -- Form of referendum petition and signature sheet.(1)This section applies only to the manual referendum process.(2)(a)Each proposed referendum petition shall be printed in substantially the following form:"REFERENDUM PETITION To the Honorable ____, County Clerk/City Recorder/Town Clerk:We, the undersigned citizens of Utah, respectfully order that (description of local law or portion of local law being challenged), passed by the ____ be referred to the voters for their approval or rejection at the regular/municipal general election to be held on __________(month\day\year);Each signer says:I have personally signed this referendum petition or, if I am an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this referendum petition by directing the signature gatherer to enter the initials "AV" as my signature;The date next to my signature correctly reflects the date that I actually signed the petition;I have personally had an opportunity to read the entire statement included with this packet;I am registered to vote in Utah; andMy residence and post office address are written correctly after my name."(b)The sponsors of a referendum or an agent of the sponsors shall attach a copy of the law that is the subject of the referendum to each referendum petition.(3)Each referendum signature sheet shall:(a)be printed on sheets of paper 8-1/2 inches long and 11 inches wide;(b)be ruled with a horizontal line three-fourths.75 inch from the top, with the space above that line blank for the purpose of binding;(c)include the title of the referendum printed below the horizontal line, in at least 14-point type;(d)if the signature sheet is part of a condensed referendum packet:(i)contain a printed QR code at the top of the signature sheet, in a location above the columns described in Subsection (3)(e);(ii)ensure that the QR code links directly to the web page on the local clerk's website described in Section 20A-7-604.5; and(iii)include the following statement adjacent to the QR code in not less than 8-point, bold type: "This QR code provides access to a website that includes the full text of the law that is the subject of this referendum petition.";(e)be vertically divided into columns immediately below the title of the referendum, as follows:(i)the first column shall begin .5 inch from the left side of the paper, be .25 inch wide, and be headed, together with the second column, "For Office Use Only";(ii)the second column shall be .25 inch wide;(iii)the third column shall be 2.5 inches wide, headed "Registered Voter's Printed Name (must be legible to be counted)";(iv)the fourth column shall be 2.5 inches wide, headed "Signature of Registered Voter";(v)the fifth column shall be .75 inch wide, headed "Date Signed";(vi)the sixth column shall be three inches wide, headed "Street Address, City, Zip Code"; and(vii)the seventh column shall be .75 inch wide, headed "Birth Date or Age (Optional); and(f)be horizontally divided into rows as follows:(i)the first row shall be .5 inch high for purposes of a registered voter's entry of the information described in Subsection (3)(e); and(ii)the second row shall span the width of each column described in Subsection (3)(e) and contain the following statement in 11-point type: "By signing this referendum petition, you are stating that you had an opportunity to read and understand the law that this referendum petition seeks to overturn.".(d)include a table immediately below the title of the referendum, and beginning .5 inch from the left side of the paper, as follows:(i)the first column shall be .5 inch wide and include three rows;(ii)the first row of the first column shall be .85 inch tall and contain the words "For Office Use Only" in 10-point type;(iii)the second row of the first column shall be .35 inch tall;(iv)the third row of the first column shall be .5 inch tall;(v)the second column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(vi)the first row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Registered Voter's Printed Name (must be legible to be counted)" in 10-point type;(vii)the second row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(viii)the third row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Street Address, City, Zip Code" in 10-point type;(ix)the fourth row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(x)the third column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(xi)the first row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Signature of Registered Voter" in 10-point type;(xii)the second row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xiii)the third row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Email Address (optional, to receive additional information)" in 10-point type;(xiv)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xv)the fourth column shall be one inch wide;(xvi)the first row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Date Signed" in 10-point type;(xvii)the second row of the fourth column shall be .5 inch tall;(xviii)the third row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Birth Date or Age (optional)" in 10-point type;(xix)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall; and(xx)the fifth row of the entire table shall be the width of the entire table, .4 inch tall, and contain the following words, "By signing this referendum petition, you are stating that you have read and understand the law that this referendum petition seeks to overturn." in 12-point type;(e)(4)the table described in Subsection (3)(d)The columns and rows described in Subsections (3)(e) and (f) shall be repeated, leaving sufficient room at the bottom of the sheet orfor the information described in Subsection (3)(f); and(5).(f)(5)at the bottom of the sheet, includeThe bottom of the signature sheet shall include, in the following order: (a)the following statement in 12-point, bold type:"This referendum petition seeks to have (description of local law or portion of local law being challenged), passed by the ____ be referred to the voters for their approval or rejection at the regular/municipal general election to be held on __________(month/day/year)."; and(b)the word "Warning," in 12-point, bold type, followed by the following statement in not less than eight-point type:"It is a class A misdemeanor for an individual to sign a referendum petition with a name other than the individual's own name, or to knowingly sign the individual's name more than once for the same referendum petition, or to sign a referendum petition when the individual knows that the individual is not a registered voterto sign a referendum petition using a name other than your own name, to sign more than once, or to sign if you are not a registered voter.Birth date or age information is not required, but it may be used to verify your identity with voter registration records. If you choose not to provide it, your signature may not be verified as a valid signature if you change your address before petition signatures are verified or if the information you provide does not match your voter registration recordsProviding your birth date or age is optional, but it may be used to verify your identity. If you do not provide it, your signature may not be validated if your address changes or if the information you provide does not match your voter registration record."(4)The final page of each referendum packet shall contain the following printed or typed statement:"Verification of signature collectorState of Utah, County of ____I, _______________, of ____, hereby state, under penalty of perjury, that:I am at least 18 years old;All the names that appear in this packet were signed by individuals who professed to be the individuals whose names appear in it, and each of the individuals signed the individual's name on it in my presence or, in the case of an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this referendum petition on the individual's behalf, at the direction of the individual and in the individual's presence, by entering the initials "AV" as the individual's signature;        I certify that, for each individual whose signature is represented in this referendum packet by the initials "AV":              I obtained the individual's voluntary direction or consent to sign the referendum petition on the individual's behalf;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual lacked the mental capacity to give direction or consent;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual did not understand the purpose or nature of my signing the referendum petition on the individual's behalf;              I did not intentionally or knowingly deceive the individual into directing me to, or consenting for me to, sign the referendum petition on the individual's behalf; and              I did not intentionally or knowingly enter false information on the signature sheet;I did not knowingly make a misrepresentation of fact concerning the law this petition seeks to overturn; andI believe that each individual's name, post office address, and residence is written correctly, that each signer has read the law that the referendum seeks to overturn, and that each signer is registered to vote in Utah.________________________________________________________________________(Name) (Residence Address) (Date)The correct date of signature appears next to each individual's name.I have not paid or given anything of value to any individual who signed this referendum packet to encourage that individual to sign it._____________________________________________________________________(Name) (Residence Address) (Date)".(5)(6)The final page of each referendum packet shall contain the circulator verification sheet described in Subsection 20A-1-1004(1).(7)If the forms described in this section are substantially followed, the referendum petitions are sufficient, notwithstanding clerical and merely technical errors.

Section 27:
Section 27. Section 20A-7-604 is amended to read:20A-7-604Effective 05/06/26. Manual referendum process -- Circulation requirements -- Local clerk to provide sponsors with materials.(1)This section applies only to the manual referendum process.(2)(a)In order to obtain the necessary number of signatures required by this part, the sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall, after the sponsors receive the documents described in Subsections (3) and 20A-7-401.5(4)(b), circulate referendum packets that meet the form requirements of this part.(b)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors may circulate referendum packets using traditional referendum packets, condensed referendum packets, or both.(3)Within five calendar days after the day on which a county, city, town, or court determines, in accordance with Section 20A-7-602.7, that a proposed referendum is legally referable to voters, the local clerk shall provide the sponsors with:(a)a copy of the referendum petition;(b)a signature sheet; and(c)a copy of the proposition information pamphlet provided to the sponsors under Subsection 20A-7-401.5(4)(b).(4)The sponsors of the referendum petition shall:(a)arrange and pay for the printing of all documents that are part of the referendum packets; and(b)ensure that the referendum packets and the documents described in Subsection (4)(a) meet the form requirements of this section.(5)(a)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors may prepare the referendum packets for circulation by creating multiple referendum packets.(b)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall create referendum packets by binding a copy of the referendum petition with the text of the law that is the subject of the referendum and no more than 50 signature sheets together at the top in a manner that the referendum packets may be conveniently opened for signing.The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall create referendum packets by:(i)binding the components of each referendum packet together at the top in a manner that secures all components of the referendum packet together;(ii)arranging the components in the following order:(A)a copy of the referendum petition;(B)if the referendum packet is a traditional referendum packet, a copy of the law that is the subject of the referendum petition;(C)the signature sheets; and(D)the circulator verification sheet described in Subsection 20A-1-1004(1);(iii)including no more than 50 signature sheets in each referendum packet; and(iv)binding the referendum packet in a manner that allows the referendum packet to be conveniently opened for signing.(c)A referendum packet is not required to have a uniform number of signature sheets.(d)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall include, with each packet, a copy of the proposition information pamphlet provided to the sponsors under Subsection 20A-7-401.5(4)(b).(6)(a)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall, before gathering signatures:(i)ensure that the sponsors or any agent of the sponsors who gathers signatures have completed the online training course described in Section 20A-1-1005;(ii)contact the county clerk to receive a range of numbers that the sponsors may use to number referendum packets;(ii)(iii)sign an agreement with the local clerk, specifying: (A)whether the sponsors or an agent of the sponsors will circulate referendum packets using traditional referendum packets, condensed referendum packets, or both; and(B)the range of numbers that the sponsor will use to number the referendum packets; and(iii)(iv)number each referendum packet, sequentially, within the range of numbers provided by the county clerk, starting with the lowest number in the range.(b)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors may not:(i)number a referendum packet in a manner not directed by the county clerk; or(ii)circulate or submit a referendum packet that is not numbered in the manner directed by the county clerk.

Section 28:
Section 28. Section 20A-8-103 is amended to read:20A-8-103Effective 05/06/26. Petition procedures -- Criminal penalty -- Removal of signature.(1)As used in this section, the proposed name or emblem of a registered political party is "distinguishable" if a reasonable person of average intelligence will be able to perceive a difference between the proposed name or emblem and any name or emblem currently being used by another registered political party.(2)To become a registered political party, an organization of registered voters that is not a continuing political party shall:(a)circulate a petition seeking registered political party status beginning no earlier than the date of the statewide canvass held after the last regular general election and ending before 5 p.m. no later than November 30 of the year before the year in which the next regular general election will be held;(b)file a petition with the lieutenant governor that is signed, with a holographic signature, by at least 2,000 registered voters before 5 p.m. no later than November 30 of the year in which a regular general election will be held; and(c)file, with the petition described in Subsection (2)(b), a document certifying:(i)the identity of one or more registered political parties whose members may vote for the organization's candidates;(ii)whether unaffiliated voters may vote for the organization's candidates; and(iii)whether, for the next election, the organization intends to nominate the organization's candidates in accordance with the provisions of Section 20A-9-406.(3)The petition shall:(a)be on sheets of paper 8-1/2 inches long and 11 inches wide;(b)be ruled with a horizontal line 3/4 inch from the top, with the space above that line blank for the purpose of binding;(c)contain the name of the political party and the words "Political Party Registration Petition" printed directly below the horizontal line;(d)contain the word "Warning" printed directly under the words described in Subsection (3)(c);(e)contain, to the right of the word "Warning," the following statement printed in not less than eight-point, single leaded type:"It is a class A misdemeanor for anyone to knowingly sign a political party registration petition signature sheet with any name other than the individual's own name or more than once for the same party or if the individual is not registered to vote in this state and does not intend to become registered to vote in this state before the petition is submitted to the lieutenant governor.";(f)contain the following statement directly under the statement described in Subsection (3)(e):"POLITICAL PARTY REGISTRATION PETITION To the Honorable ____, Lieutenant Governor:We, the undersigned citizens of Utah, seek registered political party status for ____ (name);Each signer says:I have personally signed this petition with a holographic signature;I am registered to vote in Utah or will register to vote in Utah before the petition is submitted to the lieutenant governor;I am or desire to become a member of the political party; andMy street address is written correctly after my name.";(g)be vertically divided into columns as follows:(i)the first column shall appear at the extreme left of the sheet, be 5/8 inch wide, be headed with "For Office Use Only," and be subdivided with a light vertical line down the middle;(ii)the next column shall be 2-1/2 inches wide, headed "Registered Voter's Printed Name (must be legible to be counted)";(iii)the next column shall be 2-1/2 inches wide, headed "Holographic Signature of Registered Voter";(iv)the next column shall be one inch wide, headed "Birth Date or Age (Optional)";(v)the final column shall be 4-3/8 inches wide, headed "Street Address, City, Zip Code"; and(vi)at the bottom of the sheet, contain the following statement: "Birth date or age information is not required, but it may be used to verify your identity with voter registration records.  If you choose not to provide it, your signature may not be certified as a valid signature if you change your address before petition signatures are certified or if the information you provide does not match your voter registration records.";(h)have a final page bound to one or more signature sheets that are bound together that contains the following printed statement:"VerificationState of Utah, County of ____I, _______________, of ____, hereby state that:I am at least 18 years old;All the names that appear on the signature sheets bound to this page were signed by individuals who professed to be the individuals whose names appear on the signature sheets, and each individual signed the individual's name on the signature sheets in my presence;I believe that each individual has printed and signed the individual's name and written the individual's street address correctly, and that each individual is registered to vote in Utah or will register to vote in Utah before the petition is submitted to the lieutenant governor.______________________________________________________________________(Signature) (Residence Address)(Date)"; and(i)(h)have a final page bound to one or more signature sheets that contains the circulator verification sheet described in Subsection 20A-1-1004(1); and(i)be bound to a cover sheet that:(i)identifies the political party's name, which may not exceed four words, and the emblem of the party;(ii)states the process that the organization will follow to organize and adopt a constitution and bylaws; and(iii)is signed by a filing officer, who agrees to receive communications on behalf of the organization.(4)The filing officer described in Subsection (3)(i)(iii) shall ensure that the individual in whose presence each signature sheet is signed:(a)is at least 18 years old; and(b)verifies each signature sheet by completing the verification bound to one or more signature sheets that are bound together.(5)An individual may not sign the verification if the individual signed a signature sheet bound to the verification.(6)The lieutenant governor shall:(a)use the procedures described in Section 20A-1-1002 to determine whether a signer is a registered voter;(b)review the proposed name and emblem to determine if they are "distinguishable" from the names and emblems of other registered political parties; and(c)certify the lieutenant governor's findings to the filing officer described in Subsection (3)(i)(iii) within 30 calendar days after the day on which the organization files the petition described in Subsection (2)(b).(7)(a)If the lieutenant governor determines that the petition meets the requirements of this section, and that the proposed name and emblem are distinguishable, the lieutenant governor shall authorize the filing officer described in Subsection (3)(i)(iii) to organize the prospective political party.(b)If the lieutenant governor finds that the name, emblem, or both are not distinguishable from the names and emblems of other registered political parties, the lieutenant governor shall notify the filing officer that the filing officer has seven calendar days to electronically submit a new name or emblem to the lieutenant governor.(8)A registered political party may not change itsthe registered political party's name or emblem during the regular general election cycle.(9)(a)It is unlawful for an individual to:(i)knowingly sign a political party registration petition:(A)with any name other than the individual's own name;(B)more than once for the same political party; or(C)if the individual is not registered to vote in this state and does not intend to become registered to vote in this state before the petition is submitted to the lieutenant governor; or(ii)sign the verification of a political party registration petition signature sheet if the individual:(A)has not witnessed the signing by those individuals whose names appear on the political party registration petition signature sheet; or(B)knows that an individual whose signature appears on the political party registration petition signature sheet is not registered to vote in this state and does not intend to become registered to vote in this state.(b)An individual who violates this Subsection (9) is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.(10)(a)A voter who signs a petition under this section may have the voter's signature removed from the petition by, no later than three business days after the day on which the petition is filed with the lieutenant governor, submitting to the lieutenant governor a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed.(b)A statement described in Subsection (10)(a) shall comply with the requirements described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(2).(c)The lieutenant governor shall use the procedures described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(3) to determine whether to remove an individual's signature from a petition after receiving a timely, valid statement requesting removal of the signature.

Section 29:
Section 29. Section 20A-9-405 is amended to read:20A-9-405Effective 05/06/26. Nomination petitions for regular primary elections.(1)This section applies to the form and circulation of nomination petitions for regular primary elections described in Subsection 20A-9-403(3)(a).(2)A candidate for elective office, and the agents of the candidate, may not circulate nomination petitions until the candidate has submitted a declaration of candidacy in accordance with Subsection 20A-9-202(1).(3)For the manual candidate qualification process, the nomination petitions shall be in substantially the following form:(a)the petition shall be printed on paper 8-1/2 inches long and 11 inches wide;(b)the petition shall be ruled with a horizontal line 3/4 inch from the top, with the space above that line blank for purposes of binding;(c)the petition shall be headed by a caption stating the purpose of the petition and the name of the proposed candidate;(d)the petition shall feature the word "Warning" followed by the following statement in no less than eight-point, single leaded type: "It is a class A misdemeanor for anyone to knowingly sign a nomination petition with any name other than the person's own name, or more than once for the same candidate, or if the person is not registered to vote in this state.";(e)the petition shall feature 10 lines spaced one-half inch apart and consecutively numbered one through 10;(f)the signature portion of the petition shall be divided into columns headed by the following titles:(i)Registered Voter's Printed Name;(ii)Signature of Registered Voter;(iii)Party Affiliation of Registered Voter;(iv)Birth Date or Age (Optional);(v)Street Address, City, Zip Code; and(vi)Date of Signature; and(g)a photograph of the candidate may appear on the nomination petition.(4)For the electronic candidate qualification process, the lieutenant governor shall design an electronic form, using progressive screens, that includes:(a)the following warning:"Warning: It is a class A misdemeanor for anyone to knowingly sign a nomination petition with any name other than the person's own name, or more than once for the same candidate, or if the person is not registered to vote in this state."; and(b)the following information for each individual who signs the petition:(i)name;(ii)party affiliation;(iii)date of birth or age, (optional);(iv)street address, city, zip code;(v)date of signature;(vi)other information required under Section 20A-21-201; and(vii)other information required by the lieutenant governor.(5)For the manual candidate qualification process, if one or more nomination petitions are bound together, a page shall be bound to the nomination petition(s) that features the following printed verification statement to be signed and dated by the petition circulator:"VerificationState of Utah, County of ____I, ____, of ____, hereby state that:I am at least 18 years old;All the names that appear on the signature sheets bound to this page were, to the best of my knowledge, signed by the persons who professed to be the persons whose names appear on the signature sheets, and each of them signed the person's name on the signature sheets in my presence;I believe that each has printed and signed the person's name and written the person's street address correctly, and that each signer is registered to vote in Utah."(6)(5)For the manual candidate qualification process, if one or more nomination petitions are bound together, a final page shall be bound to the nomination petition(s) that contains the circulator verification sheet described in Subsection 20A-1-1004(1).(6)The lieutenant governor shall prepare and make public model nomination petition forms and associated instructions.(7)A nomination petition circulator:(a)must be at least 18 years old; and(b)may affiliate with any political party.(8)It is unlawful for any person to:(a)knowingly sign the nomination petition described in this section or Section 20A-9-408:(i)with any name other than the person's own name;(ii)more than once for the same candidate; or(iii)if the person is not registered to vote in this state;(b)sign the verification of a signature for a nomination petition if the person:(i)has not witnessed the signing by those persons whose names appear on the nomination petition; or(ii)knows that a person whose signature appears on the nomination petition is not registered to vote in this state;(c)pay compensation to any person to sign a nomination petition; or(d)pay compensation to any person to circulate a nomination petition, if the compensation is based directly on the number of signatures submitted to a filing officer rather than on the number of signatures verified or on some other basis. unless the payment is based on:(i)an hourly rate; or(ii)a rate per valid signature.(9)Any person violating Subsection (8) is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.(10)(a)A voter who signs a nomination petition may have the voter's signature removed from the petition by, no later than three business days after the day on which the candidate files the petition with the appropriate filing officer, submitting to the filing officer a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed.(b)A statement described in Subsection (10)(a) shall comply with the requirements described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(2).(c)The filing officer shall use the procedures described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(3) to determine whether to remove an individual's signature from a nomination petition after receiving a timely, valid statement requesting removal of the signature.

Section 30:
Section 30. Section 20A-9-502 is amended to read:20A-9-502Effective 05/06/26. Certificate of nomination -- Contents -- Circulation -- Verification -- Criminal penalty -- Removal of petition signature.(1)The candidate shall:(a)prepare a certificate of nomination in substantially the following form:"State of Utah, County of ______________________________________________I, ______________, declare my intention of becoming an unaffiliated candidate for the political group designated as ____ for the office of ____.  I do solemnly swear that I can qualify to hold that office both legally and constitutionally if selected, and that I reside at ____ Street, in the city of ____, county of ____, state of ______, zip code ____, phone ____, and that I am providing, or have provided, the required number of holographic signatures of registered voters required by law; that as a candidate at the next election I will not knowingly violate any election or campaign law; that, if filing via a designated agent for an office other than president of the United States, I will be out of the state of Utah during the entire candidate filing period; I will file all campaign financial disclosure reports as required by law; and I understand that failure to do so will result in my disqualification as a candidate for this office and removal of my name from the ballot.__________________________________________Subscribed and sworn to before me this ______(month\day\year).__________________________________________Notary Public (or other officer qualified to administer oaths)";(b)for each signature packet, bind signature sheets to a copy of the certificate of nomination and the circulator verification, that:(i)are printed on sheets of paper 8-1/2 inches long and 11 inches wide;(ii)are ruled with a horizontal line 3/4 inch from the top, with the space above that line blank for the purpose of binding;(iii)contain the name of the proposed candidate and the words "Unaffiliated Candidate Certificate of Nomination Petition" printed directly below the horizontal line;(iv)contain the word "Warning" printed directly under the words described in Subsection (1)(b)(iii);(v)contain, to the right of the word "Warning," the following statement printed in not less than eight-point, single leaded type:"It is a class A misdemeanor for anyone to knowingly sign a certificate of nomination signature sheet with any name other than the person's own name or more than once for the same candidate or if the person is not registered to vote in this state and does not intend to become registered to vote in this state before the county clerk certifies the signatures.";(vi)contain the following statement directly under the statement described in Subsection (1)(b)(v):"Each signer says:I have personally signed this petition with a holographic signature;I am registered to vote in Utah or intend to become registered to vote in Utah before the county clerk certifies my signature; andMy street address is written correctly after my name.";(vii)contain horizontally ruled lines, 3/8 inch apart under the statement described in Subsection (1)(b)(vi); and(viii)be vertically divided into columns as follows:(A)the first column shall appear at the extreme left of the sheet, be 5/8 inch wide, be headed with "For Office Use Only," and be subdivided with a light vertical line down the middle;(B)the next column shall be 2-1/2 inches wide, headed "Registered Voter's Printed Name (must be legible to be counted)";(C)the next column shall be 2-1/2 inches wide, headed "Holographic Signature of Registered Voter";(D)the next column shall be one inch wide, headed "Birth Date or Age (Optional)";(E)the final column shall be 4-3/8 inches wide, headed "Street Address, City, Zip Code"; and(F)at the bottom of the sheet, contain the following statement: "Birth date or age information is not required, but it may be used to verify your identity with voter registration records.  If you choose not to provide it, your signature may not be certified as a valid signature if you change your address before petition signatures are certified or if the information you provide does not match your voter registration records."; and(c)bind a final page to one or more signature sheets that contains the circulator verification sheet described in Subsection 20A-1-1004(1).(c)bind a final page to one or more signature sheets that are bound together that contains, except as provided by Subsection (3), the following printed statement:"VerificationState of Utah, County of ____I, _______________, of ____, hereby state that:I am at least 18 years old;All the names that appear on the signature sheets bound to this page were signed by persons who professed to be the persons whose names appear on the signature sheets, and each of them signed the person's name on the signature sheets in my presence;I believe that each has printed and signed the person's name and written the person's street address correctly, and that each signer is registered to vote in Utah or will register to vote in Utah before the county clerk certifies the signatures on the signature sheet.______________________________________________________________________(Signature) (Residence Address)(Date)".(2)An agent designated to file a certificate of nomination under Subsection 20A-9-503(2)(b) or (4)(b) may not sign the form described in Subsection (1)(a).(3)(a)The candidate shall circulate the nomination petition and ensure that the person in whose presence each signature sheet is signed:(i)is at least 18 years old; and(ii)verifies each signature sheet by completing the verification bound to one or more signature sheets that are bound together.(b)A person may not sign the circulator verification if the person signed a signature sheet bound to the verification.(4)(a)It is unlawful for any person to:(i)knowingly sign a certificate of nomination signature sheet:(A)with any name other than the person's own name;(B)more than once for the same candidate; or(C)if the person is not registered to vote in this state and does not intend to become registered to vote in this state before the county clerk certifies the signatures; or(ii)sign the verification of a certificate of nomination signature sheet if the person:(A)has not witnessed the signing by those persons whose names appear on the certificate of nomination signature sheet; or(B)knows that a person whose signature appears on the certificate of nomination signature sheet is not registered to vote in this state and does not intend to become registered to vote in this state.(b)Any person violating this Subsection (4) is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.(5)(a)To qualify for placement on the general election ballot, the candidate shall, no earlier than the start of the applicable declaration of candidacy period described in Section 20A-9-201.5 and no later than 5 p.m. on June 15 of the year in which the election will be held:(i)comply with Subsection 20A-9-503(1); and(ii)submit each signature packet to the county clerk where the majority of the signatures in the packet were collected, with signatures totaling:(A)at least 1,000 registered voters residing within the state when the nomination is for an office to be filled by the voters of the entire state; or(B)at least 300 registered voters residing within a political division or at least 5% of the registered voters residing within a political division, whichever is less, when the nomination is for an office to be filled by the voters of any political division smaller than the state.(b)A candidate has not complied with Subsection (5)(a)(ii), unless the county clerks verify that each required signature is a valid signature of a registered voter who is eligible to sign the signature packet and has not signed a signature packet to nominate another candidate for the same office.(c)In reviewing the signature packets, the county clerk shall count and certify only those persons who signed with a holographic signature, who:(i)are registered voters within the political division that the candidate seeks to represent; and(ii)did not sign any other certificate of nomination for that office.(d)The county clerk shall count and certify the number of registered voters who validly signed a signature packet, no later than 30 calendar days after the day on which the candidate submits the signature packet.(e)The candidate may supplement the signatures or amend the certificate of nomination or declaration of candidacy at any time on or before 5 p.m. on June 15 of the year in which the election will be held.(f)The county clerk shall use the procedures described in Section 20A-1-1002 to determine whether a signer is a registered voter who is qualified to sign the signature packet.(6)(a)A voter who signs a signature packet under this section may have the voter's signature removed from the signature packet by, no later than 5 p.m. three business days after the day on which the candidate submits the signature packet to the county clerk, submitting to the county clerk a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed.(b)A statement described in Subsection (6)(a) shall comply with the requirements described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(2).(c)The county clerk shall use the procedures described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(3) to determine whether to remove an individual's signature from a signature packet after receiving a timely, valid statement requesting removal of the signature.

Section 31:
Section 31. Section 20A-21-201 is amended to read:20A-21-201Effective 05/06/26. Electronic signature gathering for an initiative, a referendum, or candidate qualification.(1)After filing a petition for a statewide initiative or a statewide referendum, and before gathering signatures, the sponsors shall, after consulting with the Office of the Lieutenant Governor, sign a form provided by the Office of the Lieutenant Governor indicating whether the sponsors will gather signatures manually, electronically, or both.(2)After filing a petition for a local initiative or a local referendum, and before gathering signatures, the sponsors shall, after consulting with the local clerk's office, sign a form provided by the local clerk's office indicating whether the sponsors will gather signatures manually, electronically, or both.(3)After a candidate files a notice of intent to gather signatures to qualify for a ballot, and before gathering signatures, the candidate shall, after consulting with the election officer, sign a form provided by the election officer indicating whether the candidate will gather signatures manually, electronically, or both.(4)To gather a signature electronically, a signature-gatherer shall:(a)use a device provided by the signature-gatherer or a sponsor of the petition that:(i)is approved by the lieutenant governor;(ii)except as provided in Subsection (4)(a)(iii), does not store a signature or any other information relating to an individual signing the petition in any location other than the location used by the website to store the information;(iii)does not, on the device, store a signature or any other information relating to an individual signing the petition except for the minimum time necessary to upload information to the website;(iv)does not contain any applications, software, or data other than those approved by the lieutenant governor; and(v)complies with cyber-security and other security protocols required by the lieutenant governor;(b)use the approved device to securely access a website designated by the lieutenant governor, directly, or via an application designated by the lieutenant governor; and(c)while connected to the website, present the approved device to an individual considering signing the petition and, while the signature-gatherer is in the physical presence of the individual:(i)wait for the individual to reach each screen presented to the individual on the approved device; and(ii)wait for the individual to advance to each subsequent screen by clicking on the acknowledgement at the bottom of the screen.(5)Each screen shown on an approved device as part of the signature-gathering process shall appear as a continuous electronic document that, if the entire document does not appear on the screen at once, requires the individual viewing the screen to, before advancing to the next screen, scroll through the document until the individual reaches the end of the document.(6)After advancing through each screen required for the petition, the signature process shall proceed as follows:(a)except as provided in Subsection (6)(b):(i)the individual desiring to sign the petition shall present the individual's driver license or state identification card to the signature-gatherer;(ii)the signature-gatherer shall verify that the individual pictured on the driver license or state identification card is the individual signing the petition;(iii)the signature-gatherer shall scan or enter the driver license number or state identification card number through the approved device; and(iv)immediately after the signature-gatherer complies with Subsection (6)(a)(iii), the website shall determine whether the individual desiring to sign the petition is eligible to sign the petition;(b)if the individual desiring to sign the petition is unable to provide a driver license or state identification card to the signature gatherer:(i)the individual may present other valid voter identification;(ii)if the valid voter identification contains a picture of the individual, the signature-gatherer shall verify that the individual pictured is the individual signing the petition;(iii)if the valid voter identification does not contain a picture of the individual, the signature-gatherer shall, to the extent reasonably practicable, use the individual's address or other available means to determine whether the identification relates to the individual presenting the identification;(iv)the signature-gatherer shall scan an image of the valid voter identification and immediately upload the image to the website; and(v)the individual:(A)shall enter the individual's address; and(B)may, at the discretion of the individual, enter the individual's date of birth or age after the individual clicks on the screen acknowledging that they have read and understand the following statement, "Birth date or age information is not required, but may be used to verify your identity with voter registration records. If you choose not to provide it, your signature may not be verified as a valid signature if you change your address before your signature is verified or if the information you provide does not match your voter registration records."; and(c)after completing the process described in Subsection (6)(a) or (b), the screen shall:(i)except for a petition to qualify a candidate for the ballot, give the individual signing the petition the opportunity to enter the individual's email address after the individual reads the following statement, "If you provide your email address, you may receive an email with additional information relating to the petition you are signing."; and(ii)(A)if the website determines, under Subsection (6)(a)(iv), that the individual is eligible to sign the petition, permit the individual to enter the individual's name as the individual's electronic signature and, immediately after the signature-gather timely complies with Subsection (10), certify the signature; or(B)if the individual provides valid voter identification under Subsection (6)(b), permit the individual to enter the individual's name as the individual's electronic signature.(7)If an individual provides valid voter identification under Subsection (6)(b), the county clerk shall, within seven calendar days after the day on which the individual submits the valid voter identification, certify the signature if:(a)the individual is eligible to sign the petition;(b)the identification provided matches the information on file; and(c)the signature-gatherer timely complies with Subsection (10).(8)For each signature submitted under this section, the website shall record:(a)the information identifying the individual who signs;(b)the date the signature was collected; and(c)the name of the signature-gatherer.(9)An individual who is a signature-gatherer may not sign a petition unless another individual acts as the signature-gatherer when the individual signs the petition.(10)Except for a petition for a candidate to seek the nomination of a registered political party, each individual who gathers a signature under this section shall, within one business day after the day on which the individual gathers a signature, electronically sign and submit the following statement to the website:"VERIFICATION OF SIGNATURE-GATHERERState of Utah, County of ____I, _____________________, of ______, hereby state, under penalty of perjury, that:I am at least 18 years old;All the signatures that I collected on [Date signatures were gathered] were signed by individuals who professed to be the individuals whose signatures I gathered, and each of the individuals signed the petition in my presence;I did not knowingly make a misrepresentation of fact concerning the law or proposed law to which the petition relates;I believe that each individual has signed the individual's name and written the individual's residence correctly, that each signer has read and understands the law to which the petition relates, and that each signer is registered to vote in Utah;Each signature correctly reflects the date on which the individual signed the petition; andI have not paid or given anything of value to any individual who signed this petition to encourage that individual to sign it."(11)(10)Except for a petition for a candidate to seek the nomination of a registered political party, each individual who gathers a signature under this section shall, within one business day after the day on which the individual gathers a signature, electronically sign and submit the circulator verification sheet described in Subsection 20A-1-1004(1) to the website.(11)Except for a petition for a candidate to seek the nomination of a registered political party:(a)the county clerk may not certify a signature that is not timely verified in accordance with Subsection (10); and(b)if a signature certified by a county clerk under Subsection (6)(c)(ii)(A) is not timely verified in accordance with Subsection (10), the county clerk shall:(i)revoke the certification;(ii)remove the signature from the posting described in Subsection 20A-7-217(4), 20A-7-315(4), 20A-7-516(4), or 20A-7-616(4); and(iii)update the totals described in Subsections 20A-7-217(5)(a)(ii), 20A-7-315(5)(a)(ii), 20A-7-516(5)(a)(ii), and 20A-7-616(5)(a)(ii).(12)For a petition for a candidate to seek the nomination of a registered political party, each individual who gathers a signature under this section shall, within one business day after the day on which the individual gathers a signature, electronically sign and submit the following statement to the lieutenant governor in the manner specified by the lieutenant governor:"VERIFICATION OF SIGNATURE-GATHERERState of Utah, County of ____I, _____________________, of ______, hereby state that:I am at least 18 years old;All the signatures that I collected on [Date signatures were gathered] were signed by individuals who professed to be the individuals whose signatures I gathered, and each of the individuals signed the petition in my presence;I believe that each individual has signed the individual's name and written the individual's residence correctly and that each signer is registered to vote in Utah; andEach signature correctly reflects the date on which the individual signed the petition."(12)For a petition for a candidate to seek the nomination of a registered political party, each individual who gathers a signature under this section shall, within one business day after the day on which the individual gathers a signature, electronically sign and submit the circulator verification sheet described in Subsection 20A-1-1004(1) to the lieutenant governor in the manner specified by the lieutenant governor.(13)For a petition for a candidate to seek the nomination of a registered political party, the election officer may not certify a signature that is not timely verified in accordance with Subsection (12).

Section 32:
Section 32. Section 63I-2-220 is amended to read:63I-2-220Effective 05/06/26. Repeal dates: Title 20A.(1)Section 20A-7-103.1, Constitutional amendments proposed during specified timeframe -- Analysis -- Arguments -- Publication, is repealed July 1, 2025.(2)Title 20A, Chapter 4, Part 6, Municipal Alternate Voting Methods Pilot Project, is repealed January 1, 2026.(2)Subsection 20A-7-105(5)(c), regarding the email that the sponsors of an initiative petition send to certain individuals before delivering an initiative packet to the county clerk, is repealed January 1, 2027.(3)Subsection 20A-7-105(5)(d), regarding the email recipient list and written verification that the sponsors of a statewide initiative petition submit to the lieutenant governor, is repealed January 1, 2027.(4)Subsection 20A-7-105(5)(e), regarding the email recipient list and written verification that the sponsors of a local initiative petition submit to the local clerk, is repealed January 1, 2027.(5)Subsection 20A-7-105(5)(f), regarding the validity of signatures gathered for an initiative petition, is repealed January 1, 2027.

Section 33:
Section 33.  Effective Date.(1)Except as provided in Subsection (2), this bill takes effect May 6, 2026.(2)The actions affecting Section 20A-1-1002 (Effective 07/01/27) take effect on July 1, 2027.